i
November 2015
THE UNIVERSITY OF ZAMBIA
FINANCIAL REGULATIONS
FINANCIAL REGULATIONS
Copyright © University of Zambia, 2019
Published by
the University of Zambia (Council Office)
P.O. Box 32379
Lusaka - Zambia
CONTENTS
Foreword................................................................................................................................................vi
Definitions..............................................................................................................................................xi 
Part 1: General........................................................................................................................................1
Part 2: General Accounting Responsibilities..........................................................................................5
Part 3: Budgetary Cycle.........................................................................................................................6
Part 4: Budgetary Control......................................................................................................................7
Part 5: Authority For Expenditure..........................................................................................................8
Part 6: Banking Arrangements...............................................................................................................9
Part 7: Charge Out Fees/Rates..............................................................................................................11
Part 8: Income And Receipts................................................................................................................11
Part 9: Refunds.....................................................................................................................................13
Part 10: Receivables (Debtors)..............................................................................................................13
Part 11: Payments..................................................................................................................................14
Part 12: Investments And Debt (Borrowings/Loans)............................................................................17
Part 13:Imprest......................................................................................................................................18
Part 14: Foreign Travel..........................................................................................................................20
Part 15: Personal Emoluments..............................................................................................................20
Part 16: Staff Loans And Advances......................................................................................................22
Part 17: Procurement And Stores.........................................................................................................23
Part 18: Custody Of Property...............................................................................................................25
Part 19: Disposal Of Assets..................................................................................................................26
Part 20: Loss Of Assets.........................................................................................................................26
Part 21: Accountable Documents..........................................................................................................27
Part 22: Project Management................................................................................................................29
Part 23: Audit Environment..................................................................................................................30
Part 24: Risk Management....................................................................................................................31
Part 25: Public Interest Disclosures......................................................................................................31
Part 26: Other Provisions......................................................................................................................32
Part 27: Financial Irregularities.............................................................................................................33
Part 28: Part Review Of Document......................................................................................................33
v
FOREWORD
The University of Zambia Financial Regulations have been revised to incorporate the new changes 
and omissions made since the last revision in 2011. The last revision was made in 2011 and approved 
in 2012. The regulations were revised in 2015 and came into effect from the date of approval. It is 
my honour and privilege to present to you the new revised Financial Regulations which shall also be 
accessed on the University website at http:/www.unza.zm. 
 In line with the University of Zambia Strategic Plan for the period 2013 to 2017, the institution 
according to strategic direction 2 is expected to ENHANCE FINANCIAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE 
MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS. This strategic direction centers on financial management, transparency 
and accountability in Schools, Directorates and Units.
 Financial Regulations are aimed at ensuring that there is accountability in the management of the 
University financial resources. The University Council is the body mandated to approve these regulations 
which must be adhered to in order to promote the system of accountability in the management of 
financial resources. These regulations together with the Accounting and Procedures Manual and other 
relevant policies and procedures shall form part of the system of accountability as established by 
Council. 
 These financial regulations shall be monitored by both Internal and External Auditors mandated 
to carry out Systems and Financial audits. Compliance with the Financial Regulations is mandatory for 
all members of Council, staff and students.Any violations of these regulations shall lead to disciplinary 
action in accordance with the respective disciplinary codes of conduct. 
 The officer responsible for enforcing and interpretation of these regulations is the Bursar who shall 
be the Custodian. It is my sincere hope that everyone shall all adhere to these regulations in order to 
promote “Excellence in Teaching, Research and Community Service”.
---------------------------- --------------------
Professor Enala T. Mwase PhD Date
Acting Vice-Chancellor
30 / 11 / 15
vi
How to use this document
This document shall be used together with other related policies and the Accounting Procedures Manual 
in order to promote efficiency, effectiveness and accountability of University resources. All Accounting 
staff are expected to use the Accounting Procedures Manual in carrying out the day to day activities 
as a guide. This is aimed at promoting uniformity and consistency in the manner financial issues are 
handled.
 The purpose of this document, and other related financial documents, is to provide control and 
accountability over the University resources and provide management with assurance that the resources 
are properly applied and used to achieve the objectives of the institution.
The budget holders are responsible for ensuring that these regulations are disseminated to members 
of staff and at any given point in time, the office of the Bursar shall assist in the interpretation of the 
documents.
In case of any new activity not covered by these regulations, the budget holder should contact the 
Bursar for guidance.
vii
1.0 DEFINITIONS
1.1 “ACT” means the Higher Education Act No. 4 of 2013 hereinafter referred to as “the Act”.
1.2 “ASSETS” means all property of the University of Zambia.
1.3 “BUDGET HOLDER” means a Dean, Director, or Head of Unit of the University charged with 
implementing University programme(s).
1.4 “BUDGETARY UNIT” means School, Directorate, Institute and Unit. The Head of the Budgetary 
Unit shall be a Budget Holder.
1.5 “BURSAR” means the Bursar of the University of Zambia appointed under Section twelve of 
the Act. For the purposes of these regulations, the Bursar shall include his/her nominees.
1.6 “CHANCELLOR” means the Chancellor of the University of Zambia appointed under Section 
seven of the Act.
1.7 “CHIEF INTERNAL AUDITOR” means the officer of the University of Zambia directly 
accountable to Council and responsible for carrying out reviews of University Management 
Systems.
1.8 “COUNCIL” means the Council of the University of Zambia established under Section sixteen
of the Act.
1.9 “DEPUTY VICE-CHANCELLOR” means the Deputy Vice-Chancellor of the University of 
Zambia appointed under Section nine of the Act.
1.10 “FINANCE AND INFRASTRUCTURE COMMITTEE” means the Finance and 
Infrastructure Committee of Council.
1.11 “FINANCIAL OFFICER” means accounting officer charged with responsibility of financial 
matters of a budgetary unit.
1.12 “FINANCIAL IRREGULARITY” means any act which is either illegal or otherwise in 
conflict with the financial regulations.
1.13 “IMPREST SYSTEM” means the system for maintaining a cash float on a revolving basis.
1.14 “LEGAL COUNSEL” means the officer of the University of Zambia, charged with 
responsibility of providing legal services, advise and professional guidance to University 
Council and management.
1.15 “REGISTRAR” means the Registrar of the University of Zambia appointed under Section ten
of the Act. For the purposes of these regulations, the Registrar shall include his/her nominees.
1.16 “RESIDENT ENGINEER” means the officer of the University of Zambia responsible for 
planning, directing and superintending the activities of all civil engineering, transport and 
mechanical maintenance sections.
1.17 “SAFE” means safes, strong rooms and cash boxes for safe custody of cash, accountable 
documents and other valuables of the University.
viii
1.18 “SENATE” means the Senate of the University of Zambia constituted under section twenty two
of the University Act. 
1.19 “UNIVERSITY PROCUREMENT COMMITTEE” means the Committee established under 
Section fourteen of the Public Procurement Act No. 12 of 2008. 
1.20 “UNIVERSITY” means the University of Zambia established under the Higher Education Act 
No. 4 of 2013.
1.21 “VICE-CHANCELLOR” means the Vice-Chancellor of the University of Zambia appointed 
under Section eight of the Act. For the purposes of these regulations, the Vice-Chancellor 
shall include his/her nominees.
1
PART 1: GENERAL
A. PREAMBLE
1.1 RECOGNISING 
(a) That the University Council is the body ultimately responsible for the management of 
all financial resources of the University. The full functions of Council are contained in 
section twenty-five of the Act;
(b) That the Finance and Infrastructure Committee, subject to the direction and control of 
the University Council, deals with, advises on all matters relating to the financial affairs 
and infrastructure of the University and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, 
the Committee is responsible for:
(i) Making recommendations to Council on annual estimates of income and 
expenditure for each financial year;
(ii) Making recommendation to Council the supplementary estimates of income or 
expenditure;
(iii) Considering the annual accounts and recommend to Council;
(iv) Considering and approve recommendation with financial implications arising from 
other Committees of Council;
(v) Approving the level of fees and other charges levied by Council from time to time;
(vi) Exploring and considering ways and means of diversifying the revenue base of the 
University;
(vii) Proposing the investment Policy of the University;
(viii) Considering financial matters referred to it by the Vice-Chancellor;
(ix) Considering the recommendations of external auditors and to determine audit fees 
as well as any other fees which are payable to auditors in respect of non-audit 
activities;
(x) Reviewing the relationship with external auditors;
(xi) Considering and recommending to Council (where appropriate) plans for 
infrastructure development of the University;
(xii) Considering and recommending to Council requests for allocation of University 
land for estate development; and
(xiii) Considering any other business that might be referred to the Committee by Council.
(c) Council shall approve the procedures and systems of the University.
(d) That the adoption of annual income and expenditure estimates by Council constitutes 
the authority for disbursement of funds within the approved allocations;
 (e) That the Vice-Chancellor is the University officer directly answerable to Council for the 
implementation of the University financial policy;
 (f) That the Registrar is responsible to the Vice-Chancellor for the implementation of the 
decisions of Council and Senate and that the Registrar is responsible for the custody of 
the seal of Council and the records and property of the University;
(g) That the Bursar under the general direction of the Registrar is responsible for financial 
planning and the general administration of the finances of the University;
(h) That the Bursar is responsible for maintaining books of accounts of the University in 
such form and manner as may be prescribed by Council;
(i) That the Bursar is responsible for ensuring that yearly financial statements comprising 
a statement of financial position (balance sheet), statement of comprehensive income 
2
(income and expenditure), a statement of cash flows (cash flow statement) and statement 
of changes in accumulated fundsare prepared in accordance with the International 
Financial Reporting Standards (IFRS) and submitted to the Auditor General or any 
Auditor appointed by the Auditor General within six months after the end of each 
financial year as required by the Act;
(j) That the Bursar is responsible for providing regular budgetary performance statements 
of the University; and
(k) That Budget Holder shall exercise general superintendence over the academic, 
administrative and financial affairs of schools, directorates, institutes and units.
1.2 NOW THEREFORE these Financial Regulations make provisions for:
(a) the collection, recording, custody, issuing, spending, and management of University 
assets;
(b) the keeping of all necessary records, books, registers and accounts;
(c) The preparation of revenue and expenditure estimates;
(d) The preparation of financial reports;
(e) Audit requirements;
(f) Public disclosures;
(g) Risk Management; and
(h) Investment, debt and treasury management.
 B. DURATION OF THE FINANCIAL REGULATIONS
These regulations may be cited as the University of Zambia Financial Regulations of 2015 and 
shall come into effect upon approval by Council. The regulations shall remain in force at all 
times subject to amendments by Council.
C. REVOCATION OF 2011 FINANCIAL REGULATIONS
The University of Zambia 2011 Financial Regulations are hereby revoked.
3
PART 2: GENERAL ACCOUNTING RESPONSIBILITIES
2.1 The Registrar shall be responsible for safeguarding of University assets.
2.2 The Bursar shall at all times be responsible for keeping of proper books of accounts of the 
University.
2.3 Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the responsibilities of the Bursar shall include:
(a) accounting for receipts and disbursement of money in accordance with these regulations;
(b) ensuring that proper arrangements are made for the safe keeping of money and accountable 
documents in accordance with these regulations;
(c) Attending to any audit queries received promptly.
(d) exercising strict supervision over all officers under his or her authority and taking precautions 
against fraud and irregularities.
2.4 Accounting staff shall abide by the Zambia Institute of Chartered Accountants (ZICA) code of 
ethics for professional accountants and the Accountants’ Act No. 13 of 2008. Non accounting staff 
shall be expected to abide by their respective code of ethics.
2.5 There shall be a hand-over whenever there is need to assign duties from one officer to another. 
The hand-over shall be evidenced in writing and signed for by both parties and witnessed by an 
authorised independent person.
2.6 University employees, and others with responsibility for the administration or management of 
University property, must not use their authority or office for personal gain, and must always seek 
to uphold their professional ethical standards, and enhance the reputation of the University.
PART 3: BUDGETARY CYCLE
3.1 (a) By March 31st, each year the Bursar shall:
(i) Produce a detailed budget performance report for the preceding twelve months to 31 
 December.
 (ii) Distribute the detailed budget performance report to the budget holders.
 (b) By 30th April each year the Vice-Chancellor shall:
 (i) Issue budgeting guidelines to all Budget Holders;
(ii) Request Budget Holders to submit their detailed estimates of income including donor 
support; and 
(iii) Request Budget Holders to submit their detailed expenditure requirements for the 
following year under separate headings:
(a) Recurrent Expenditure and
(b) Capital Expenditure
3.2 By 31st August, all submissions from Budgetary Units should be received by the Bursar.
4
3.3 By 30th September, the Bursar shall consolidate budget submissions from budget holders to 
produce a draft proposed budget for onward submission to the Ministry.
3.4 By 30th November, the Vice-Chancellor shall submit the amended draft consolidated budget to 
the Finance and Infrastructure Committee for consideration.
3.5 By 31st December, a consolidated draft proposed budget shall be submitted to the Council for 
adoption.
3.6 Once approved by Council, the budget shall form authority for expenditure and shall be 
communicated to the Budget Holders by the Vice-Chancellor.
PART 4: BUDGETARY CONTROL
4.1 It is the responsibility of the Budget Holder to ensure that expenditure is in accordance with 
approved budget.
4.2 Budget Holders shall submit budget performance reports on a monthly basis to the ViceChancellor, who shall report to Council on a quarterly basis.
4.3 Variations of budget sums from one budget line to another may be proposed by the Budget Holder 
who shall seek permission of the Vice-Chancellor for each variation. The Vice-Chancellor shall 
exercise discretion to approve or disapprove an application to vary budget line.
4.4 Bursar shall refer to the Vice-Chancellor of any claim of unusual nature, or any claim the 
validity of which is doubtful and any claim in respect of expenditure which is not provided for 
in the approved estimates.
4.5 Where Bursar receives instructions to make a payment, which is not covered by a financial 
authority, the Bursar shall advise the Vice-Chancellor in writing of the lack of financial authority.
4.6 Where inspite of the advice given under regulation (4.5) an instruction to pay is given in writing 
to the Bursar by the Vice-Chancellor, a payment may be made or accepted by the Bursar, but 
responsibility for the payment shall rest with the Vice-Chancellor, who shall be held personally 
liable.
4.7 After payment is made pursuant to regulation (4.5), the Vice-Chancellor shall in writing inform 
the Finance and Infrastructure Committee and Audit Committee of Council of the circumstances 
under which such payment is made.
4.8 All authorities to incur expenditure under the budget shall expire on the last business day of the 
financial year to which they refer. No payment may be made against these authorities after that 
date.
4.9 Where funds are received after the budget is finalised, the Vice-Chancellor shall submit an 
application to Council for supplementary estimates to regularise the expenditure.
PART 5: AUTHORITY FOR EXPENDITURE
5.1 Authority for expenditure shall rest with the Budget Holder or his or her nominee who shall not 
permit any expenditure to be incurred unless there is confirmation by the Bursar or his or her 
nominee on availability of funds and that such expenditure is in line with the budget.
5.2 The Vice-Chancellor and the following officers are authorised to commit the University as 
5
follows:
(i) Vice-Chancellor up to K50, 000
(ii) Deans and Directors up to K30, 000
(iii) Head of Unit up to K15, 000
5.3 Any procurement above K50 thousand and up to K10 million shall be approved by the University 
Procurement Committee. The authority limits indicated above shall vary in line with guidelines 
provided by the Zambia Public Procurement Authority.
5.4 The above thresholds shall not apply to requests for imprest advance.
5.5 When the expenditure is of an emergency nature which was not envisaged when budget 
was prepared or when the excess expenditure on an item cannot be met from savings on 
another budget line, the Budget Holder shall submit to the Vice-Chancellor an application for 
supplementary variation budget. The Vice-Chancellor shall submit such application to Council 
and the outcome shall be communicated to the Budget Holder.
PART 6: BANKING ARRANGEMENTS
6.1 All arrangements for opening of bank accounts in the name of the University shall be approved 
by Council. Proposed signatories on all bank accounts and any subsequent changes shall also 
be approved by Council.
6.2 Each of the bank accounts shall have at least two panels of signatories; A and B. Panel A shall 
comprise signatories from the accounting staff and Panel B shall comprise signatories from the 
non-accounting staff. Each category shall have not more than four (4) signatories.
6.3 Lists of authorised officers together with their specimen signatures shall be sent to the Chief 
Internal Auditor by the Bursar.
6.4 The use in the Financial Regulations of the term “authorised signatory” shall encompass 
electronic as well as written signatures.
6.5 The term “electronic signature” means data in electronic form which are attached to or logically 
associated with other electronic data and which serve as a method of authentication. Electronic 
signatures must only be used in such circumstances and for such transactions as have been 
approved in advance by the Bursar. 
6.6 All such electronic signatures shall take such form and technical specification as required by the 
Bank. 
6.7 The ordering of cheques shall be done by the authorised signatories.All cheque books received 
shall be properly recorded and kept in a safe.
6.8 The authorised signatories may transact with the Banks on a day to day basis through an 
authorised agent.
6.9 Cheque books and cheque forms shall be kept safe when not in use. The Bursar shall be 
responsible for the custody and control of cheque books and shall maintain a record of receipts 
and issuance of cheque books.
6.10 Where a cheque has been lost or mislaid or misplaced, the budget holder shall be informed and 
a ‘stop payment’ order raised to the issuing bank. 
6
6.11 All cheques issued by the University shall have cash cover in the bank account. Any temporary 
advance obtained from the bank shall have prior permission in writing from the Vice-Chancellor.
6.12 Where payments above certain limits requiring supporting documents as deemed by the Bank, 
the Bursar shall ensure that such documents are provided.
6.13 Where no banking facilities exist, the Bursar shall bring to account all revenues collected 
through the nearest bank to their station, at least twice every month.
6.14 No other currencies may be accepted as payment for any transaction without the specific 
authority of the Bursar.
6.15 Foreign currencies shall be exchanged for Zambian currency only at any commercial bank or 
bureau-de-change.
PART 7: CHARGE OUT FEES/RATES
7.1 Levels of charges for all University services provided shall be reviewed regularly by the Bursar 
in consultation with Registrar and approved by Council.
PART 8: INCOME AND RECEIPTS
8.1 The Bursar shall be the chief receiver, custodian and paymaster of the University. 
8.2 Tuition, accommodation and other fees must be paid direct into the University bank account 
through the Student Bill Muster or other arrangements as approved by Council
8.3 All monies received by the University shall be banked intact within 24 hours of receipting or on 
the following business day. Post-dated cheques shall not be accepted.
8.4 Cash received on behalf of the University shall not be used to defray expenditure.
8.5 Under no circumstances shall University funds be used for private purposes.
8.6 Whenever money is received on behalf of the University, an official receipt shall be issued by 
an authorised officer.
8.7 Authorised receivers of University funds shall bring to account daily all monies collected.
8.8 Receipts shall be issued and used in consecutive order. All copies of cancelled receipts shall be 
retained in the receipt book.
8.9 Under no circumstances shall post dated cheques be accepted as payment for goods or services 
of the University.
8.10 When a cheque is dishonoured, immediate action shall be taken to secure payment of the amount 
owed, including referral of the matter to the Legal Counsel.
8.11 If the dishonoured cheque was originally received in payment of tuition fees, the Registrar shall 
be informed.
8.12 Before acceptance of a cheque, Bursar shall ensure that;
(a) the identity of the person presenting the cheque is ascertained;
(b) the cheque is not post dated or stale;
7
(c) the amount in words and figures agree; and
(d) the cheque is correctly signed and dated by the drawer;
(e) alterations of any kind are duly signed for by every signatory to the cheque.
8.13 Investment of idle or surplus funds shall be in accordance of the University Investment Policy.
PART 9: REFUNDS
9.1 There shall be no refunds in respect of properly invoiced tuition and other fees paid, except 
where the student withdrawals with permission and the refund is authorised by the Registrar. 
9.2 Where a refund has been authorised, an appropriate surcharge shall be applicable
9.3 No refunds shall be made to any person other than from whom the original payment was 
received.
9.4 No refunds shall be paid on photocopies of receipts.
PART 10: RECEIVABLES (DEBTORS)
10.1 Administration of receivables shall be in line with the Credit policy
10.2 No bad debts shall be written off unless prior consent has been obtained from Council. All 
efforts must be made to collect debts before recommendation to Council for write-off.
10.3 In an event that the University owes any amounts (creditors) and vice-versa and there is an 
intention to off-set the debt, the Vice-Chancellor shall approve such a request to off-set the debt. 
The Vice-Chancellor reserves the right to off-set debt. 
10.4 Any student owing the University shall not be re-enrolled by the University and shall have no 
access to University facilities.
10.5 Any student owing the University at the time of graduation shall not receive the certificate until 
fees are paid in full. 
PART 11: PAYMENTS
11.1 Payments shall only be made on official pre-numbered payment vouchers.
11.2 All payments must be supported by appropriate and relevant documentation.
11.3 No payments shall be made on the basis of a statement of account.
11.4 Payments shall only be made to the persons to whom the payment is due.
11.5 Only in the following circumstances may payments be made other than to the person to whom 
payment is due:
(a) on the written authority of the person or firm to whom the payment is due or on the 
production of a power of attorney or letters of administration;
(b) where there is a court order directing that payment be made to a duly appointed receiver, 
an official receiver, a trustee in bankruptcy or a named third person.
11.6 All payments shall be made by a crossed cheque and or a bank transfer. Payments by open 
8
cheque shall only be drawn in the name of the Cashier and other authorised agents to meet cash 
disbursements.
11.7 Payment vouchers shall be made out in ink or in electronic print and all copies must be legible.
11.8 The payment voucher shall be prepared, checked and authorised in the Bursar’s department.
11.9 Where an original invoice has been misplaced or lost, a duplicate shall be obtained from the 
supplier. 
11.10 The duplicate shall be clearly marked “Copy Invoice”.
11.11 Certification that payment has not previously been made shall be recorded on the voucher by 
the officer making payment, after the officer is satisfied that payment of the account has not in 
fact been made.
11.12 Where a misplaced or lost invoice is found after payment on a certified duplicate copy, the invoice 
shall be attached to the payment voucher and shall form part of the supporting documents.
11.13 The Officer signing a voucher or document certifies the accuracy and validity of the payment 
and should therefore ensure that:
(a) all deductions due to be made from salaries or wages have in fact been made;
(b) the goods have been supplied or services rendered as certified by the receiving officer;
(c) the prices charged are either according to the contract or approved rates, and are fair and 
reasonable according to current rates;
(d) that all documents are stamped ‘’PAID’’ and cheque number indicated;
(e) the payment is based on proper authority and is a proper charge to institutional funds;
(f) the calculations are correct;
(g) the person named as payee is entitled to receive payment;
(h) the voucher is properly coded;
(i) payment of the amount stated on the voucher will not cause an excess over the amount 
available;
(j) adequate arrangements have been made for recoveries of advances; and
(k) all payments are recorded in a register.
11.14 Payment vouchers relating to purchases must be supported by original copies of supplier’s 
invoice, goods received note, purchase order, quotations, comparative statement and purchase 
requisition.
11.15 Where a duplicate or photocopy of the original supporting documents in ‘63’ above has been 
used, the Purchasing Manager shall certify them as true copies of the original 
11.16 No payment should be made to a supplier for the purchase of goods or services without evidence 
that goods or services have been delivered, except in special cases as approved by the Registrar. 
11.17 All cheque signatories are responsible, when signing, for ensuring -
(a) that all payments are supported by appropriate and relevant documentation.
(b) that the payment documents are correctly made out in every respect.
11.18 Paying officers shall satisfy themselves that the person claiming the payment is in fact the 
person authorised to receive the payment. They shall also ensure that the person collecting 
9
the payment is identified by production of an official identification document such as National 
Registration Card, Driving Licence or Passport.
11.19 All payment vouchers together with supporting documents shall be filed and secured against 
loss.
11.20 Access to payment documents shall be restricted to authorised personnel.
11.21 All payments by cheque or cash for goods, services and works shall be acknowledged by 
receipts.
11.22 Any document which is acquitted, certified and approved by a responsible officer shall form 
part of receipts.
11.23 All payments shall be subject to pre-audit.
11.24 Bursar shall ensure that payments for foreign procurements are secured against loss.
11.25 Consultancy expenditure for the University shall be handled in line with the Consultancy Policy 
as approved by Council.
PART 12: INVESTMENTS AND DEBT (BORROWINGS OR LOANS)
12.1 The Finance and Infrastructure Committee is responsible for devising treasury policy to outline 
both investment and borrowing policies which shall be in line with Government regulations for 
both secured and unsecured loans.
12.2 All investments shall be approved by Council with prior authority of the Minister.
12.3 All borrowings shall be approved by Council and where applicable by Government.
12.4 All borrowing shall be undertaken in the name of the University and shall be in line with 
Government requirements.
PART 13: IMPREST
13.1 Except for Imprest paid to students for research purposes,Imprest shall only be paid to full 
time University employees.
13.2 All requests to establish the standing imprest floats shall be authorised by the Registrar.
13.3 In addition to monies authorised for expenditure under Part 5 of these regulations, the Bursar 
shall make such advances in consultation with Budget Holders to meet small cash payments. 
13.4 The Budget Holder shall authorise all expenses incurred through standing imprest.
13.5 Petty cash shall be maintained on an imprest system. Where reimbursement of petty cash 
has been requested, the Petty Cash Book shall be supported by paid petty cash vouchers and 
approved by the budget holder.
13.6 All persons receiving money from petty cash and/or other imprest must acknowledge receipt of 
the money by signature and the purpose of the expenditure must be recorded.
13.7 All imprest shall be used for the purpose for which it is intended. The Budget Holder shall at no 
time authorise any amounts of ‘I Owe You’ (I O U) to staff out of imprest. 
13.8 Under no circumstances shall any officer be issued with another imprest while there is already 
an imprest outstanding in the officer’s name.
10
13.9 No student with outstanding imprest shall be allowed to graduate.
13.10 At the end of each financial year each imprest holder shall sign a Cash Count Certificate.
13.11 Special or accountable imprest obtained for the purposes of:
(a) research and consultancy work;
(b) workshops, seminars and conferences; and
(c) any other official activities.
Shall be retired within 48 hours after the purpose for which it was obtained has been fulfilled. 
Under exceptional circumstances, imprest shall be retired at the next opportunity in the next 
working day.For imprest obtained by Officers in provincial centres, retirement shall form part 
of the monthly returns.
13.12 Subsistence allowance shall be paid as imprest and shall be retired upon submission of a report 
for the activity. 
13.13 Any unspent balance shall be surrendered to the Accountant or Cashier immediately on the 
officer’s return to the station and a receipt shall be issued to that effect.
13.14 Accountants shall submit to the Budget Holder a schedule of outstanding imprest every month 
and the budget holder shall take action against any officer who has unretired imprest.
13.15 If imprest is not cleared within 48 hours, the Accountant shall inform the Budget Holder who 
shall instruct in writing, the Bursar through the Registrar to deduct the whole amount outstanding 
from the salary of the imprest holder.
13.16 A record of the issue and retirement of all imprest shall be in a register of imprest.
13.17 Retirement of imprest shall be by filling in the imprest retirement form by the imprest holder. 
The imprest retirement form shall be certified by the supervisor and approved by the Head 
of Department.
13.18 When reimbursing petty cash and/or imprest, any cash at hand shall be evidenced by a cash 
certificate from the Cashier.
13.19 Partial retirement of imprest shall not be allowed.
PART 14: FOREIGN TRAVEL
14.1 The following documents shall be required for foreign travel payments:
(i) When an employee has been invited (non sponsored or fully sponsored);
(a) invitation letter
(b) authority to travel from the Vice-Chancellor
(ii) Travel initiated by the University;
(a) confirmation of registration or participation
(b) authority to travel from the Vice-Chancellor
11
PART 15: PERSONAL EMOLUMENTS
15.1 The Registrar shall notify the Bursar, of all appointments, promotions, demotions, re-grading, 
resignations, dismissals, retirements, deaths, terminations of contracts, absence from duty, loan 
and advances to employees or any other circumstances that affect the payroll. This should be in 
line with the Remuneration and Recruitment Policy.
15.2 All personal emoluments shall be paid through the Bursar’s department.
15.3 Salaries, wages and allowances for any part of the month shall be calculated on a proportion to 
the number of days in that particular month.
15.4 Salaries, wages and allowances shall be paid directly to the credit of an employee’s account 
at any bank using the approved bankers Electronic Funds Transfer System (EFT) unless under 
exceptional circumstances which shall be approved by the Bursar.
15.5 The Bursar shall ensure that third party obligations including statutory obligations are paid in 
full and distributed to the beneficiaries on a monthly basis.
15.6 The Bursar shall be responsible for the preparation of the University payroll and ensure that it 
is verified and reconciled.
15.7 The Registrar shall maintain the following records:
(a) establishment register as approved by Council;
(b) payroll schedules;
(c) payslips for the tax year; and
(d) individual records on salary progression for all employees.
15.8 Budget Holders shall ensure that attendance registers of employees working outside normal 
working hours are maintained.
15.9 The payroll shall be subject to pre-audit.
15.10 The Registrar shall approve the payroll.
15.11 All Budget Holders shall be responsible for scrutinising the monthly payroll under their control 
and notifying the Registrar of any anomalies.
15.12 Salaries shall be paid monthly in arrears.
15.13 Payment of personal emoluments shall be made in accordance with the terms and conditions of 
service of the employee.
15.14 The Registrar shall ensure that all recoveries of advances and loans are made.
15.15 The Registrar shall ensure that no employee takes home less than 25 percent of their basic pay.
PART 16: STAFF LOANS AND ADVANCES
16.1 Loans and advances shall be approved by the Registrar.
16.2 All loans and advances shall be paid in Bursar’s Department through the Salaries Office.
16.3 The University may guarantee employee’s loans with a Building Society or any financial 
institution. Such guarantees shall be communicated to the legal office.
16.4 No loans or advances shall be approved for any purpose to an employee who is on suspension 
or while his or her case is pending decision.
12
16.5 No loans or advances shall be made to an employee whose indebtedness to the University 
results into their take home pay reducing to less than 25 percent of his or her basic pay or as 
provided in the labour law.
16.6 The repayment terms shall be determined by the Registrar.
PART 17: PROCUREMENT AND STORES
17.1 Procurement of all goods, services and works of the University shall be the responsibility of the 
Purchasing and Supplies Unit.
17.2 The Procurement Department is responsible for purchasing plan.
17.3 All procurement by the University shall be in accordance with the The Public Procurement Act
No. 12 of 2008 and the University of Zambia Procurement Policy.
17.4 Direct bidding or Single sourcing of goods and services shall be approved by the ViceChancellor.Circumstances or conditions under which direct bidding or single sourcing can be 
allowed are as stipulated in the Public Procurement Act No. 12 of 2008.
17.5 The purchase, lease or rent of land, buildings or plant shall be approved by Council.
17.6 The Resident Engineer shall be responsible for providing regular reports and updates on 
contracts related to works and other infrastructure related works.
17.7 Officers signing purchase requisitions shall be responsible for ensuring that there is proper 
authority for the expenditure being incurred. 
17.8 Under no circumstances shall requisitions for local supplies be issued in arrears if goods have 
already been supplied. Where goods are supplied before a requisition is issued, the responsible 
officer shall certify the voucher giving reasons for the failure to issue a requisition before hand.
17.9 Official orders must be issued for all goods and services to be supplied with the exception of 
goods and services for the following supplies:
(a) Public Utility Services;
(b) Periodic payments such as rents or rates;
(c) Petty cash payments and imprest;
(d) Running contract for provision of services; and
(e) Annual renewals such as Subscription, software licences and membership.
17.10 The Stores Controller shall be responsible for stocks and stores held at the Central and other 
Satellite Stores of the University. Apart from purchases made through petty cash, all procurements 
made by the University shall be delivered to Stores. This shall include all supplies from Donors.
17.11 The Stores Controller shall produce a monthly report of the stock position including receipts, 
issues, balances and values. 
17.12 Issues from Stores may only be made when a Stores Requisition has been raised and authorised 
by the budget holder.
17.13 A system of continuous stock taking shall be carried out at Stores. All stocks shall be counted 
at least once every year.
13
17.14 A stock take report shall be issued after a stock taking exercise.
17.15 The annual stock-taking exercise shall be supervised by Bursars department and witnessed by 
Auditors.
17.16 Officers signing requisitions and stores order shall be responsible for ensuring that proper 
authority exists for the expenditure being incurred.
PART 18: CUSTODY OF PROPERTY
18.1 The management and custody of assets shall be in line with the Asset Management and Disposal 
Policy.
18.2 The Registrar is responsible for overall custody of assets of the University.
18.3 The Registrar shall maintain a record of all assets of the University and produce a status report 
monthly. 
18.4 The Budget Holders shall be responsible for custody of assets in the respective budgetary units.
18.5 No property of the University shall be used for other than the intended purpose.
18.6 Any movement of University assets shall be authorised and documented.
18.7 A fixed Asset Register shall be maintained by the Bursar for accounting purposes.
18.8 The custodians of University assets shall ensure that risk mitigation measures are instituted in 
accordance with the University Risk Management Policy.
PART 19: DISPOSAL OF ASSETS
19.1 The University shall dispose off all redundant and obsolete assets through the Movable Assets 
Disposal Committee on a regular basis in accordance with the Asset Management and Disposal 
Policy.
19.2 All Assets identified for disposal shall be transferred from the Fixed Asset register of the owner 
unit to that of Central Stores.
19.3 The Movable Assets Disposal Committee shall seek authority from the Registrar for disposal of 
assets.
19.4 The Movable Assets Disposal Committee shall produce a report which shall be used to amend 
the assets records. 
19.5 Personal-to-holder vehicles and household furniture shall be disposed off in accordance with 
employment contract terms.
PART 20: LOSS OF ASSETS
20.1 Losses of assets may occur, through wilful action, negligence, fraud, forgery, misappropriation, 
theft, burglary, accidents and natural causes.
20.2 Whenever a loss of any kind occurs, the incident shall immediately be:
(a) reported to the immediate supervisor by the quickest means and shall be confirmed in 
writing soon after;
 (b) investigated; and
14
(c) reported to the police where the Registrar considers that the circumstances of the case 
makes it necessary to do so.
20.3 Arising from the foregoing (20.1 above) the immediate supervisor shall submit a report to the 
relevant authorities recommending the next course of action.
20.4 Where evidence of an offence is established, Registrar shall take appropriate action in accordance 
with the University’s Disciplinary Code of Conduct. 
20.5 Registrar shall prepare a loss report and submit to Council for approval to write-off.
PART 21: ACCOUNTABLE DOCUMENTS
21.1 The Bursar or his or her nominee’s shall have control over custody and issue of all the following 
documents:
 (a) Cheque Books or Forms
 (b) Receipt Books
(c) Debit Note Books
(d) Credit Note Books
(e) Invoice Books
21.2 The Purchasing and Supplies Manager his or her nominees shall have control over custody and 
issue of all the following documents:
(a) Order Books
(b) Purchase Requisition
(c) Goods Received Notes
(d) Stores Requisitions/Issue Notes.
21.3 Under no circumstances shall any officer make arrangements for the printing of accountable 
documents without the approval of the Registrar.
21.4 Accountable Documents shall be issued and used in consecutive order.
21.5 The Budget Holder shall authorise a requisition of all Accountable Documents.
21.6 No Accountable Documents may be transferred between Budgetary Units. 
21.7 Each Budgetary Unit shall maintain a register of all Accountable Documents.
21.8 The Budget Holder shall ensure that Accountable Documents are kept safely.
21.9 All losses of Accountable Documents shall be reported to the Registrar for the purpose of 
taking appropriate measures to protect the University and the general public.
21.10 Where an accountable document is cancelled, the original and all the copies shall be cancelled 
and signed for by a responsible officer and retained in the book.
21.11 Accounting records shall be preserved for the following periods of time:
(a) ordinary commercial transactions - 6 years
15
(b) transactions relating to land - 11 years
21.12 Under no circumstances shall records be destroyed before the external audit of the year to 
which they relate has been completed.
21.13 Vice-Chancellor shall obtain authority from Council for the destruction of obsolete receipt 
forms which are complete and unused.
21.14 The destruction of obsolete receipt forms shall be carried out in the presence of the Bursar and 
Chief Internal Auditor who shall check that the obsolete receipt forms which are to be destroyed 
are complete and unused.
21.15 A certificate of destruction, listing the serial numbers of all obsolete receipt forms which have 
been destroyed, shall be signed by both officers referred to in regulation 21.14.
21.16 The original certificate of destruction shall be filled by the Bursar and a copy of the certificate 
shall be sent to the Vice-Chancellor.
PART 22: PROJECT MANAGEMENT
22.1 Externally funded projects shall be approved by the Vice-Chancellor and shall be managed 
using procedures outlined in these financial regulations except as agreed in the Memorandum 
of Understanding (MOU).
22.2 All MOUs shall be signed by the Vice-Chancellor.
22.3 Separate bank accounts shall be maintained for each project which shall close immediately the 
project comes to an end. 
22.4 Records, in respect of all projects, shall be maintained separate from University accounting 
records. 
22.5 Where applicable, the University management fee shall be paid in accordance with the University 
of Zambia Consultancy Regulations.
22.6 Project Financial Reports shall be included as appendices to the University Financial Report.
22.7 It is the responsibility of the Budget holder to ensure that conditions set in the agreement are 
followed including Financial Reporting to avoid putting the institution’s image at risk. Any 
Loss or failure to meet the conditions in the agreement will lead to disciplinary action.
PART 23: AUDIT ENVIRONMENT
23.1 The University shall be audited by both Internal and External Auditors.
23.2 Internal Audit: The Unit shall be responsible for conducting an independent appraisal of all 
the University activities, process, financial and otherwise. The activities of Internal Audit shall 
be approved by Audit Committee and carried out according to the Audit Charter approved by 
Council.
23.3 The existence of internal audit shall not relieve authorising officers of their individual 
responsibilities, nor shall it remove the need for normal checks within the University.
23.4 External Audit: The office mandated by law to conduct external audits of the University is 
the Office of the Auditor General (unless permission is granted to the institution to subcontract 
other private firms). The appointment of the private firm is conducted by the Auditor General in 
16
consultation with the University Council. The audit fees shall be determined by Council.
23.5 Both the external and internal auditors have the right to access, at all reasonable times, the 
books, records, accounts and vouchers of the University.
PART 24: RISK MANAGEMENT
24.1 Management shall take into account provisions of the Risk Management Policy and procedures 
in its decision making process.
PART 25: PUBLIC INTEREST DISCLOSURES
25.1 Conflicts of interest; A conflict of interest is deemed to exist whenever an employee is in a 
position to further any personal financial interest for himself or herself or a member of his or her 
family, as a result of the nature or responsibility of his or her employment with the institution. 
Examples of what would be considered as conflict of interest include the following:
(a) Where an employee has an investment or financial interest in, or holds a position with, any 
supplier, customer or competitor of the University.
(b) Where an employee discloses or uses confidential information gained by reason of 
employment by the University for profit or advantage for himself or herself or anyone else.
This clause should be read together with the Conflict of interest policy where it is expected that 
every year each employee shall be required to fill in a declaration of interest form which shall 
be included on their personal file.
25.2 Business Ethics: The University shall conduct all its affairs in line with business ethics. 
25.3 Confidential information: Unless published by the University, all Information shall be 
treated as confidential (both financial and otherwise) in line with the Information Security and 
Confidentiality Policy.
PART 26: OTHER PROVISIONS
26.1 STUDENTS’ UNION
Finances for the Students’ Union shall be managed by the Union Executive under the supervision 
of the Dean of Students.The Union funds shall be kept in a separate bank account.
26.2 GIFTS, ENTERTAINMENT AND HOSPITALITY
No staff in his or her own capacity should accept a gift of nominal value in his or her name 
but in the name, and to benefit the institution. . Gifts of money shall not be entertained. Any 
hospitality extended to any member of staff shall not be accepted if it appears to duly influence 
decisions in favour of the provider.
Reasonable amounts of expenditure for any hospitality and/or entertainment of third parties to 
further the business of the University shall be approved by the Registrar
26.3 SIGNING AND SEALING OF CONTRACT
Signing of contracts and sealing shall be in accordance with the Act.
26.4 RECORDS MANAGEMENT
Records management,whether financial and otherwise shall be in accordance with the Records 
Management policy.
PART 27: FINANCIAL IRREGULARITIES
27.1 Fraudulent and Corrupt Activities: Whenever a matter arises which involves or is perceived 
17
to involve irregularities, concerning income, expenditure, cash, stores or other property of the 
University, or irregularities in the exercise of the functions of the University, the Registrar, 
the Bursar and the Chief Internal Auditor shall be notified immediately. All employees of the 
University shall in their operations comply with the Bribery and Corruption Policy.
27.2 When the Registrar, the Bursar and the Chief Internal Auditor receive information concerning 
suspected irregularities, necessary steps shall be taken to investigate the matter and report on it.
27.3 Any decision to hand over a case involving suspected financial irregularities to the police or any 
law enforcement agency shall only be taken by the Registrar or his or her nominees.
27.4 Any member of staff who fails to abide by these regulations shall be deemed to have breached 
University regulations and may be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the 
University Code of Conduct.
PART 28: PART REVIEW OF DOCUMENT
28.1 The Financial Regulation shall be reviewed periodically.



 
Table of Contents
Foreword... 111
Working Definitions 
A cronyms 
Part 1: Policy
 Introduction 
2.0	Situation analysis 
3.0	Vision 
4.0	Policy Statement 
	4.1	Policy Goal 
	4.2	Policy Objectives 
	4.3	Policy Strategies 
5.0	Scope 
6.0	Responsibility 
7.0	Implementation Framework 
	7. I 	Institutional Framework 
7.2 Legal Framework 
8.0	Policy Monitoring, Evaluation and Review 
9.0	Policy development procedure 
Part Il: Procedures
10.	Procedures on Recruitment of Staff in the University 
10.1	General Procedure on Recruitment of Management, Academic and Non-Academic Staff 
10.1.1	Procedure on Internal Recruitment 
10.1.2	Procedure on External Recruitment 
10.1.3	Procedure on Submission of Applications for Recruitment 
10.1.4	Procedure on Retention of Applications for Jobs  10
10.2	Procedure on Recruitment of Vice-Chancellor and Deputy Vice-Chancellor	10
10.3	Procedure on Recruitment of Visiting Staff 11
10.4	Procedure on Recruitment of Honorary/ Part-Time Staff  11
10.5	Procedure on Recruitment of Staff on Casual, Temporary,
Seasonal and Short term Basis  12
	11.0	Procedure on Selection of Staff in the University   13
I I .1 General Procedure on Selection of Management, Academic and
Non-Academlc Staff in the University 13
I I .2 Procedure on Recruitment of Vice-Chancellor and Deputy
Vice-Chancellor 16
	12.0	Procedure on Recruitment of New Employees (Local) 16
	13.0	Procedure on Recruitment of New Employees (International) 17
	14.0	Procedure on Recruitment of Reserve Candidates 18
	15.0	Procedure on Confirmation in New Position 18
ii
FOREWORD
The process of recruitment and selection must be fair, systematic, efficient and effective, ensuring that equality of opportunity. Since University of Zambia is labour intensive institution, its success relies on its ability to attract competent and highly talented employees available on the labour market. All recruitment and selection procedures and decisions shall reflect UNZA'S commitment to providing equal opportunity by assessing all potential candidates according to their skills, knowledge, qualifications and capabilities. To this end, no consideration shall be given to any form of discrimination including ethnicity, age, gender, marital status, race, religion and disability.
 
Professor Luke E. Mumba	Date
VICE-CHANCELLOR
iii
WORKING DEFINITIONS
Casual employee
Executive Management
Employee
Full-Time
Internal advertising
Internal applicant
Management
Other Staff	means a person whose employment:
(a)	is not permanent in nature;
(b)	does not require any skill in the performance of the work to be done; and
(c)	terms provide for payment at an hourly rate, payable at the end of each day
means a staff appointed as principal officers or at the same level with principal officers in the University.
means a person who, in return for wages, enters into a contract of service whether on full time, part time or temporary basis or who is engaged to do casual work, but does not include a person employed under a contract of apprenticeship made in accordance with the Apprenticeship Act, an independent contractor or a person engaged to do piece work.
means employment under a contract of service that stipulates the maximum number of statutory or conventional hours prescribed for a week, month or year, but excludes overtime work.
means advertising in any media that IS accessible only by internal applicants who are currently University of Zambia employees.
means a person employed at the University of Zambia at the time of applying or responding to a University of Zambia Job advertisement.
means staff or group of employees appointed in a managerial positron or equivalent, reporting to a position at senior management level.
means an employee serving under the terms and conditions of service for University of Zambia Allied and Workers' Union.
Professional and Technical Staff means an employee serving under the terms and conditions of service for University of Zambia Professional Staff Union.
Probation	means the period specified for assessing the suitability of an employee for the job from commencement date to the date when employment or appointment is confirmed in writing to the employee by the University Council.
Procedure	means a step-by-step process to be followed in the recruitment and selection process.
Recruitment	means a process of attracting potential candidates for appointment and engaging them into a vacant position.
Seasonal employment	means employment under a contract of service where the timing and duration of the contract is influenced by seasonal factors such as climate, agricultural or business peak cycle.
Selection	means a process of assessing the suitability of attracted candidates and recommending the best suited candidate for appointment in a position.
Senior Management	means a staff appointed in managerial positions reporting to Principal Officers or equivalent positions.
Short term contract	means a contract of service of six months but not exceeding twelve months.
Strategic Position	means a position that has a significant impact on one or more of the university capabilities or a position characterized by a significant amount of variability in the performance of the employees holding such a position.
Temporary employment	means service under a contract of service where a person IS engaged to do relief work in the absence of a substantive employee, and may include employment which is part-time, but does not include a person engaged on a short-term contract.
 
ACRONYMS
HoD	 	Head of Department
HRC	 	Human Resources Committee
Hoi-J	 	Head of Unit
UNZA	 	University of Zambia
UNZALARU	 	University of Zambia Lecturers and Researchers' Union
vi
PART 1:
RECRUITMENT AND SELECTION POLICY
vii
 
1.0 INTRODUCTION
Human Resources Management is a strategic functional partner to other strategic organisational functions such as Finance. The core of human resources management is acquisition of effective staff for an organisation. Without sufficient, well qualified and skilled employees, an organisation can hardly implement its strategic and operational plans and thus fail to achieve its mandate. In recognition of this fact, most well managed institutions have policies for staff resourcing.
This Recruitment and Selection Policy and Procedures is a direct response to challenges that have been faced by the University of Zambia in recruiting staff. The policy addresses matters regarding recruitment and selection of staff, responsibilities of various stakeholders and structures in the process as well as other matters that impact recruitment.
2.0 	SITUATION ANALYSIS
Since its inception the University of Zambia has not had an express and/or written policy on recruitment and selection. The unavailability of such a policy often times made decision making in matters of recruitment of staff difficult. However, In recruiting staff, the University has relied on practice already set as precedent, best practice known in other organisattons as well as wisdom and other University documentation that aid in recruitment. In terms of documentation, the University has a Human Resources Manual that has summary policies and procedures on a number of human resource management functions as well as a document on qualifications for positions, While these documents have been of great help in the recruitment of staff, the lack of a written policy on recruitment and selection of staff sometimes has Impacted negatively in as far as consistence In decision making is concerned.
In order to alleviate the above void, this Recruitment and Selection Policy and Procedures has provided the salient components of the recruitment and selection process, stakeholder involvement in the process as well as other issues related to recruitment and selection.
3.0 	VISION
It is the vision of the University of Zambia to be a provider of world class services in higher education and knowledge generation. However, without sufficient, qualified, skilled and competent workforce, the university cannot achieve its vision. In recognition of this fact, this Policy has been formulated. It is therefore the University's vision to have a recruitment and selection policy and procedures in order to achieve the University's vtsion and mission.
4.0 	POLICY STATEÌvŒNT
The University is an equal opportunity employer whose policy on recruitment and selection is to acquire, In a cost effective manner, the optimum number of employees with the best mix of competencies required to meet its current and future needs.
4.1 	Policy Goal
The goal of this Recruitment and Selection Policy is to guide, effectively and efficiently, and also to have a transparent and fair recruitment and selection process.
4.2 Policy Objectives
The objectives of the policy are to:
a)	Outline and standardise the processes of recruitment and selection;
b)	Attract the best candidate for the job based on merit and ensure the identification of the person best suited for the job and the institution;
 Provide the means by which the recruitment and selection of staff is conducted in a professional, timely and responsive manner and in compliance with current employment legislation.
d Enhance the reputation of the University as recruitment and selection are a key public relations exercise.
e)	To model best practices in recruitment and selection that may result in an efficient and effective recruitment process.
f)	Provide a cost effective process for recruitment and selection of staff.
 Enforce a culture of transparency and fairness In matters of staff recruitment and selection.
4.3	Policy 
For this policy to be effectively implemented, the following strategies shall apply.
a)	Council Office shall ensure that recruitment and selection procedures are followed strictly during the recruitment process.
b)	The Registrar's Office shall ensure that each Head of Unit or Department is made aware of the University's policy and procedures on recruitment and selection. Ultimately it is the responsibility of the senior management in the University in conjunction with Council Office to ensure awareness of the policy.
 Each Head of Unit or Department shall be expected to adhere to the University's policy and procedures on recruitment and selection.
d)	The University will provide appropriate training, development, and support to those involved in Recruitment and Selection activities in order to meet the set or desired standards.
 Provide Job Descriptions for all positions.
f)	All the stipulated stakeholders shall be involved in conducting recruitment and the required quorum met in undertaking selections
g)	Advertise positions whenever they fall vacant and need to fill the vacant positions is established. In the event that two consecutive advertising efforts do not yield anything, head hunting shall be considered as an option to fill a vacancy.
5.0 SCOPE
This recruitment and selection policy and procedure encompasses all activities that form part of the recruitment and selection process. The policy shall be applicable to all University positions.
6.0 	RESPONSIBILITY
It shall be the overall responsibility of the Council Office to ensure that all staff involved in the process of recruitment and selection adhere to the provisions of this policy in order to ensure transparency and fairness throughout the recruitment and selection processes.
7.0 	INPLENŒNTATION FRANŒWORK
7.1 Insúuú)nal Framework
The Council Office shall coordinate the process of recruitment and selection. Once approval has been received from the Registrar's Office, the recruitment process will be initiated and completed using
provisions in this policy and procedures. A number of stakeholders will be involved in the recruitment process. The section below indicates the various roles each of the stakeholders will play in the process.
7.1. I Recruiting Unit/ Department
The role of the recruiting Unit/ Department is to initiate the recruitment process, participate in shortlisting and selection processes. Thus, once a position has been formally established, or a vacancy has artsen, the Head of the affected Unit or department shall write to the Registrar to seek authority to have a position filled. The request to the Registrar shall be accompanied by details such as how the vacancy has risen, establishment for the Unit as well as proof that the position was budgeted for or has fallen vacant within the financial year hence making it a replacement case.
7.1.2 Registrar's Office
The role of the Registrar's Office In the recruitment and selection process is to authorize the recruitment as well as other activities associated with the recruitment and selection process. These include appointment of the selection panel as well as appointing successful candidates. However, the appointments exclude candidates for the position of Vice-Chancellor, Deputy Vice-Chancellor and Registrar.
Thus, once a request for authority to fill a position has been received by the Registrar, verification in terms of availability of establishment and finances will be done in consultation with Council Office. If satisfied, the Registrar shall inform the recruiting Unit of the approval and also Instruct Council office to commence the recruitment process.
7.1.3 The Minister's Office
In line with the Higher Education Act No. 4 of 2013, the Minister, responsible for education shall appoint the Search Committee for the positions of Vice-Chancellor and Deputy Vice-Chancellor. The Minister shall also authorwe the Chairperson of Council to appomt candidates for the positions of Vice-Chancellor and Deputy Vice-Chancellor.
7.1.4 Council Office
The role of the Council Office in the Recruitment Process is to coordinate the recruitment and selection process. The office is also responsible for the recruitment budget. Once Instruction to recruit have been received from the office of the Registrar, Council office shall advertise the position to be filled and coordinate the other activities as outlined under section Part Il of this document.
7.1.5 The Human Resources Committee	 
The role of the Human Resources Committee includes chairing of all interviews for all positions on the University establishment. Except for cases involving Executive Management (Principal Officers) the Committee receives and considers recommendations for appointment of successful candidates following a selection process.
7.1.6 Composition of Interview Panel
a)	The Interview Panel shall be chaired by a member of the Human Resources Committee and other members shall include representation from Council Office, recruiting unit and other members both within and outside the University who may be deemed appropriate (experts in the field under consideration) depending on the level and nature of the position.
b)	Any Interview Panel member who has a close personal relationship with an applicant or a shortlisted candidate is expected to declare their interest (to avoid conflict of interest) to the Chair of the panel or to the Registrar's Office so that alternative arrangements can be made to avoid any unfairness, whether actual or perceived, in the recruitment and selection process.
c)	Where there is disagreement amongst a panel as to the successful candidate, the majority view shall prevail. In an event of a tie, the chairperson shall have a casting vote.
d)	Quorum for interview panels shall be 100%. However, in an event that one of the panel member is unable to continue sitting on the panel for various reasons, the scores for such a member shall be dropped i.e. they shall not count towards the overall scores.
7.1.7 Executive Planning and Resources Committee
The role of the Executive, Planning and Resources Committee includes chairing of all interviews for Executive Management positions. The Committee also receives and considers recommendations for appointment of successful candidates in Executive Positions following a selection process.
7.1.8 The University Council
The University Council is the ultimate employer of all staff in the University. Its role in the recruitment and selection process is to ratify decisions made by the Human Resources Committee and the Executive Planning and Resources Committee on recruitment matters.
7.2 	Legal Framework
This Policy has been formulated in line with the higher Education Act No. 4 of 2013. It shall also comply with any laws In Zambia that govern matters on recruitment and selection.
8.0 POLICY MONITORING, EVALUATION AND REVIEW
This Policy will be reviewed every 3 years. The Council Office shall Initiate the process of review and the normal process of approval shall be followed. Where changes in employment legislation occur that directly affect this policy and procedure, they will be reflected with immediate effect and communicated to stakeholders.
Where possible, every selection meeting will take an opportunity to collect information from candidates on the University's recruitment and selection process as a mechanism of improving recruitment and selection practices.
9.0 POLICY DEVELOPMENT PROCEDURE
This policy has been initiated and prepared by the Office of the Deputy Registrar (Council), the office mandated to coordinate recruitment and selection function in the University. The approval of this Policy followed a consultative process. The Policy Formulation and Development Committee and the Senior Management Committee reviewed the draft document after which it was approved by a combined meeting of the Executive Planning and Resources Committee and the Human Resources Committee at its meeting held on 24th May 2017. The Policy was finally ratified by the University Council at its meeting held on 30th June 2017,
PART П: PROCEDURES 
10. PROCEDURES ON RECRUITMENT OF STAFF IN THE UNIVERSITY
There are a number of key stages in recruiting for a post. This procedure outlines the key stages and provides operating guidelines.
10.1 GENERAL PROCEDURE ON RECRUITMENT OF MANAGEMENT, ACADEMIC AND NON-ACADEMIC STAFF
The following shall be the procedure for recruitment:
a)	The process of recruitment shall be initiated by the Head of Unit or Department in various Units In liaison with Council Office by identifying a vacant position arising from, among others, the following: death, resignation, promotion, dismissal, end of contract, retirement, transfer and creation of a new position.
b)	Once the vacancy has been identified, the Head of Unit or Department shall request the Registrar for approval to fill the position. Approval to recruit shall be subject to the availability of funds, among other things.
c)	Once the request to fill the vacant position has been approved, a decision shall be made to either fill the vacancy internally or externally.
d)	All adverts shall run for a period not exceeding two weeks i.e. applicants shall have a maxrmum period of two weeks within which to apply for a vacant position. MÏhere advertisements are done through print media, the insertions should not exceed four (4) times.
10.1.1 Procedure on Internal Recruitment
The following procedure shall apply for internal recruitment:
a) Once approval to recruit Internally is granted, the Council Office in liaison with the requesting Unit shall prepare an internal advertisement based on the job description and specification.
b Except for management, academic and positions that may be considered speciahsed or strategic, all job vacancies shall be internally advertised in order to give equal opportunity to all deserving employees with requisite qualifications to apply.
c)	The Council Office shall then advertise the vacancy on the notice boards and UNZA intranet. The advertisement shall also be circulated to the Heads of Units and Departments.
d)	While advertisements shall be prepared by the Registrar's Office (Council), relevant consultations should be undertaken with the Recruiting Department/unit, external experts or relevant professional bodies.
e)	Interviews shall still be conducted even if there is only one shortlisted candidate.
f)	Where there are no suitably qualified job candidates for the advertised position (s)  the job vacancies shall be externally advertised.
10.1.2 Procedure on External Recruitment
The following procedure shall apply for external recruitment:
a)	Management, academic and positions that may be considered strategic shall be advertised externally, including positions, which will initially be advertised internally, but without yielding any candidates with requisite qualifications.
b)	Once approval to recruit externally is granted, the Council Office in liaison With the requesting Unit shall prepare an external advertisement based on the job description and specification.
c)	The Council Office shall then advertise through print and electromc media (intranet, e-mail, and website).
d)	Interviews shall still be conducted even if there is only one shortlisted candidate.
10.1.3 Procedure on Submission of Applications for Recruitment
All applications emanating from both the internal and external applicants shall be received by the Office of the Registrar. In both cases, all applicants shall be required to submit application letters/forms, together with certified copies of educational qualifications, traming and other necessary testimonials as well as names of three referees.
10.1.4 Procedure on Retention of Applications for Jobs
The University receives applications for employment in two different modes. Those solicited when a position is advertised and those unsolicited. In both cases, the following shall apply:
a)	For the solicited applications, they shall be retained for a maximum period of three months after a position has been filled after which they shall be disposed of. However, other documentation generated during the recruitment process such as the list of applicants, summary of shortlisted candidates, minutes of the shortlist as well as mmutes of the Interviews shall be retained.
b)	For unsolicited applications, those belonging to non-academic staff shall be retained for a maximum period of one year while those for academtc staff shall be retained for a period of two years after which they shall be disposed of.
c)	Once a vacancy is identified, both solicited and unsolicited applications shall be considered.
10.2 PROCEDURE ON RECRUITMENT OF VICE-CHANCELLOR AND DEPUTY VICE-CHANCELLOR
The following shall be the procedure for recruitment:
a)	The process of recruitment shall be initiated by Council Office by identifying a vacant position arising from, among others, the following: death, resignation, promotion, dlsmrssal, end of contract, retirement, transfer and creation of a new position.
b)	Once the vacancy has been identified, the Registrar shall be requested for approval to fill the position. Approval to recruit shall be subject to the availability of funds, among other things. Once approved, the Registrar shall write to the Minister requesting for the appointment of a Search Committee as provided for in the Higher Education Act No. 4 of 2013.
c)	Once the Minister has appotnted a Search Committee, the Registrar shall convene a meeting to discuss modalities of recruiting and selecting for the vacant post.
d)	Once modalities for recruiting are agreed upon by the Committee, an advertisement shall be issued in both print and electronic media.
10.3 PROCEDURE ON RECRUITMENI' OF VISITING STAFF
The following shall be the procedure for recruitment:
a)	The process of recruitment shall be initiated by Head of Unit in an academic Unit in liaison with the office of the Registrar.
b)	Once the Registrar has authorized the engagement, the requesting unit shall discuss the application for the prospective visiting academic staff and submit the application, curriculum and minutes to Council office for consideration by the Human Resources Committee,
c)	In the case of appointment of the visiting academic staff to the rank of either Associate Professor or Professor, the Head of Unit shall submit the candidate's application and School Human Resources Cornmlttee mmutes to the ViceChancellor for the appointment of the Special Committee to ascertain whether or not the applicant is suitable for appointment as either Associate Professor or Professor.
d)	The Chairperson of the Special Committee shall submit the assessment report to the Vice-Chancellor who shall in turn forward it to the Registrar for consideration by the Human Resources Committee of Council.
 In the event that the Special Committee has established that the candidate is not suitable for appointment to the rank of either Associate Professor or Professor, the candidate shall be communicated to in writing by the Registrar stating the reasons thereof and the case shall not be escalated to the Human Resources Committee of Council for consideration.
10.4 PROCEDURE ON RECRUITMENT OF HONORARY/PART-TIME STAFF
The following shall be the procedure for recruitment:
 ) The process of recruitment shall be initiated by Head of Unit or Department In varrous academic Units in liaison with Council Office by identifying the number of vacant positions available on part-time basis. The indicators for need to have parttime staff shall include among others, unavailability of staff to teach a course(s) and Increased numbers of students. Part-time Lecturers shall be part of the departmental establishment and that no application for part-time lecturers shall be considered where the departmehtal establishment is full, unless the application is backed by an increase In student population and where full-time lecturers are not clatming for excess teaching load allowance.
b)	One (I) month before the beginning of the next academic year, Schools shall submit a list of the required number of Part time Lecturers, Tutors and Demonstrators to the Office of the Registrar in order to enable Management plan for the recruitment process.
c)	Once approval has been granted to recruit Part-Time Lecturers, Tutors and Demonstrators, interested candidates shall obtain application forms from Schools. Duly completed application forms shall be submitted to the Office of the Deputy Vice-Chancellor for approval.
d)	Before approval, the Office of the Deputy Vice-Chancellor shall send the duly completed application forms to Council Office for verification and to ascertain the vacancies or need for a Part-Time Lecturer, Tutor or Demonstrator. All applications shall be accompanied by supporting documentation, including the departmental establishment, Indicating clearly the number of lecturers in post and courses they are teaching, vacant positions, variance and the number of part-time lecturers being requested for and the courses they shall be teaching.
e)	Once Council Office has verified the request, the Deputy Vice-Chancellor shall approve the appointment of a Part-Time Lecturer, Tutor or Demonstrator,
f)	Following approval of the application, the office of the Registrar shall prepare an appointment letter.
10.5 PROCEDURE ON RECRUITMENT OF STAFF ON CASUAL, TEMPORARY,
SEASONAL AND SHORT TERM BASIS,
The University shall strictly adhere to the provisions of the Employment Act, particularly the amended 2015 Employment Act Number 15 on the recruitment and selection of staff on casual, seasonal, temporary and short term basis.
The followtng shall be the circumstances under which the University shall recruit casual, seasonal, temporary and short-term employees:
(a)	Covering for an employee who, among other reasons, is out for maternity leave, special leave and Illness;
(b)	Hiring an expert or rare skills for a specific propct with a clearly defined timeline;
(c)	Anticipated busy season such as during the peak season in the case of Liempe Farms and UNZA Printer.
The following shall be the procedure for recruitment:
a)	The process of recruitment shall be initiated by Head of Unit or Department In various Units in liaison with Council Office by identifying vacant positions which may need to be filled by staff on casual, temporary or short-term basis. Temporary and short term vacancies may arise from, among others, the following: sabbatical leave, maternity leave, illness etc.
b)	Once the vacancy has been identified, the Head of Unit or Department shall request the Registrar for approval to fill the position. Approval to recruit shall be subject to the availability of funds among other things.
c)	Once the request to fill the vacant position has been approved, Council Office shall advertise on the intranet and notice boards within the University.
d)	Council Office shall liaise with the requesting Unit in arranging an Ad-hoc Committee meeting on shortlisting candidates. The Ad-hoc Committee shall be appointed by the Registrar, Deputy Vice-Chancellor or Vice-Chancellor depending on the vacancy being filled. The Ad-hoc Committee shall also look into the database of unsolicited applications for shortlisting.
e)	Recornmendations of the Ad-hoc Committee shall be submitted to the Registrar for appointment of applicants on casual, temporary or short-term employment contract.
11.0 PROCEDURE ON SELECTION OF STAFF IN THE UNIVERSITY
There are a number of key stages in selecting for a post. This procedure outlines the key stages and provides operating guidelines.
11.1 GENERAL PROCEDURE ON SELECTION OF MANAGEMENT, ACADEMC
AND NON-ACADEÑffC STAFF IN THE UNVERSITY
The following procedure shall apply for selecting potential employees:
a)	All received and recorded applications by the Registrar's Office shall be forwarded to Council Office for sorting and preparation of summaries.
b)	Once applications have been sorted and summarized, Council Office shall then forward applications to the requesting Unit.
c)	All applicants should be assessed against the person specification and should meet, as a minimum, what was specified in the job advert.
d)	Those involved in short-listing should only use the evidence provided in the application when assessing the applicant against the criteria and should not use information obtained informally from other sources.
e)	Within the Unit, a short-listing Committee chaired by the Head of Unit with representation from Council Office, shall then be constituted to short-list the applicants. Proceedings of the short-listing Committee meeting shall be recorded and the minutes shall be submitted to Council Office. Short-listing for all posts shall be undertaken by a minimum of three people to avoid any possibility of bias, one of whom would normally be the direct supervisor.
f)	Any member of staff involved in a selection process who has a personal or family relationship with an applicant must declare interest and recuse himself/herself from the recruitment and selection process.
g)	All candidates shortlisted shall be invited to attend interviews and where there are a lot of candidates shortlisted for interviews, various recruitment and selection methods shall be used to reduce the number of shortlisted candidates to manageable levels.	 
h)	Interviews shall still be conducted even if there is only one shortlisted candidate.
i)	Depending on the nature of the position, the short-listed applicants shall be subjected to the appropriate selection criteria such as Interviews, Assessment centres, Aptitude tests, Verbal presentations, Practical exercises and Psychometric
tests.
j)	Council Office shall liaise with the requesting Unit in arranging for an Interview Panel (Selection Committee) meeting which shall be chaired by a member of the
University Council. The Interview Panel shall be appointed by the Registrar, Deputy Vice-Chancellor, Vice-Chancellor or the Chairperson of Council, depending on the vacancy being filled.
k)	The Interview Panel shall include representation from Council Office and other members both within and outside the University who will be deemed appropriate (experts in the field under consideration) depending on the level and nature of the position. To be recommended for appointment, a non-academic candidate must score a minimum of 60% during the interviews.
l)	For academic staff, the minimum scores for appointment shall be as determined by Management from time to time.
m)	All short-listed applicants shall be invited in writing, electronically and by phone to appear before the Interview Panel at least one (I) week before the selection meeting,
n)	Referee Reports: referee reports shall normally be requested from three (3) referees before the case is submitted to the Human Resources Committee for consideration. The report shall accompany the recommendations of the interview panel and the report is intended to confirm the suitability of the shortlisted applicant. Ultimately all job offers are subject to, inter alia, satisfactory references. In the event that the University receives an adverse referee's report on the candidate, the offer of employment shall be withdrawn.
o)	Recommendations of the Interviewing Panel (Selection Committee) shall be submitted to the Human Resources Committee of Council for consideration. Successful applicants shall be notified through a letter of offer of employment by the Registrar. Included in the offer, shall be two (2) copies of the conditions of service, medical form and a job description. The identification of the most suitable candidate (s) shall be based on the Interviewing panel's aggregate score and not on Interviewers comments.
p)	Unsuccessful applicants shall be informed of the outcome of the application by the Office of Deputy Registrar (Council)/and or Registrar depending on the position being considered.
q)	Candidates shall be required to notify the University within two weeks of receipt of the appointment documentatlon whether they are taking up the offer or not. After two weeks ( from the date of the offer letter) without communication from the candidate, the offer shall lapse and the reserve candidate shall be appointed. If there is no reserve candidate, the position shall be re-advertised.
11.2 PROCEDURE ON RECURUITMENT OF VICE-CHANCELLOR AND DEPUTY VICE-CHANCELLOR
In case of the Vice-Chancellor and the Deputy Vice-Chancellor, the selection process shall be in accordance with provisions of the Higher Education Act Number 4 of 2013. However, the following shall apply:
a)	Once appomted by the Minister, the Search Committee shall set its Terms of Reference (TORS) which may include the following:
1) To search for, and garner, a pool of candidates who identify with the University's vision and meet the criteria for the position;
ii)	To produce a short-list of candidates who identify with the University's vision and who meet the criteria for the position;
iii)	To choose from this pool of candidates the best candidate and submit a proposal for his or her appointment, with reasons for its choice.
b)	Once agreed on ToRs, agree on roadmap for interviews. The road map may include a variety of assessments such as the Assessment Centre, ordinary interview, stakeholder vetting and psychometric testing.
c)	Once a candidate has been selected, the Executive, Planning and Resources Committee and Council shall consider the recommendations of the Search
Committee.
f) Finally, Council shall recommend to the Minster the selected candidate for consideration and approval.
12.0 PROCEDURE ON RECRUITMENT OF NEW EMPLOYEES (LOCAL)
The following procedure shall apply for engaging potential employees:
 ) A new employee shall be required to undergo a medical check-up by UNZA Health Services before taking up the appointment. A Medical Certificate shall be submitted
directly to Council Office together with the signed letter of acceptance of offer. The cost of the medical examination shall be borne by the prospective employee.
b)	Following successful medical certification, the employee shall be provided with Personnel Data Forms for completion. Once the forms have been completed, the Contracts Officer shall then enter the details of the prospective employee into the Human Resources Information System. The employee number shall then be issued to the employee.
c)	New employees shall be required to fill-in key forms such as staff identity forms and forms for institutional email.
13.0 PROCEDURE ON RECRUITNŒNT 	OF 	NEW 	EMPLOYEES (INTERNATIONAL)
The University of Zambia is a globally acknowledged University whose internationalization is reflected in the composition both its international students and staff. Once a candidate who is not Zambian has been selected and appointed, the following procedure shall apply.
a)	The employee shall be, in compliance with national laws, vetted with relevant authorities.
b)	Once cleared, Council Office shall communicate with the candidate informing them that they have been offered employment by the University. The candidate shall also be informed to avail medical certificate of fitness if they are taking up the appointment.
c)	Once confirmation IS received within two weeks that they are taking up the offer, Council Office will commence the process to acquire a work permit. Other arrangements such as travel shall also be commenced at this stage. Thus, the Passages Officer shall be informed to be in touch with the candidate.
d)	Once the work permit has been secured and travel arrangements finalized, upon arrival, the recruiting Unit shall be informed by Council Office to receive the new employee. Before the new employee receives their first salary, the recruiting Unit shall be responsible for their welfare in terms of accommodation and meals.
e)	Once at the unwersity, the new employee shall be required to undergo a medical check-up by UNZA Health Services before taking up the appomtment. A Medical Certificate shall be submitted directly to Council Office together with the signed
letter of acceptance of offer. The cost of the medical examination shall be borne by the prospective employee.  
f)	Following successful medical certification, the employee shall be provided with Personnel Data Forms for completion. Once the forms have been completed, the Contracts Officer shall then enter the details of the prospective employee into the Human Resources Information System. The employee number shall then be issued to the employee.
g)	New employees shall be required to fill-in key forms such as staff identity forms and forms for institutional email.
14.0 PROCEDURE ON RECRUITMENT OF RFSERVE CANDIDATFS
The following procedure shall apply for engaging reserve candidates:
a)	Upon receipt of a decline letter from a selected candidate or upon receipt of a request to fill a position, the Registrar shall instruct Council Office to check the availability of reserve candidates for possible consideration.
b)	Once availability of reserve candidates is confirmed, Council Office will prepare necessary appointment documentation for the identified reserve candidate.
15.0 PROCEDURE ON CONFIRMATION IN NEW POSITION
All first appointment in the University shall be subject to probation. The probation period for non-academic members of staff shall be for a period not exceeding six (6) months, and one (I) year for academic staff. Once the probationary period has been served, the following procedure shall apply for confirmation:
a)	The Head of the Unit shall assess the candidate's performance based on the key result areas for the position in which the new member of staff is employed. The assessment shall be considered by the Unit Human Resources Management
Committee.
b)	Once considered, the Head of Unit shall submit the recommendations of the Unit Human Resources Management Committee to Council Office for confirmation by
the Registrar. The recommendations shall be submitted to Council office at least a month before the end of the probation period.
c)	Head of Units/Departments should ensure that before the probation period is over, candidates are assessed for confirmation in their positions.
 



 
Foreword
Sexual is an emerging phenomenon in educational institutions from primary school, secondary school through to tertiary colleges and universities in Zambia. The implications of sexual harassment are variable. However, the more obvious ones include: emotional disturbance, psychological trauma, strained relationships and hostile environment. This leads to poor work performance or academic output and achievement, or impaired academic progression on the part of students. Furthermore, sexual harassment has a negative effect on the work environment in that the core values of social justice, integrity and inclusiveness are compromised. Thus, efforts to pursue the core functions of teaching, research and public service and general operations of the University are adversely affected.
Since its establishment the University has had no policy on sexual harassment. In recognition of the challenges and implications of sexual harassment at institutional level, it was deemed prudent that a policy to provide guidelines on how to deal with issues pertaining to this emerging phenomenon be developed and implemented. The University has an affirmative duty to address the issue of sexual harassment and to devise appropriate preventive and educative measures for the mitigation against its occurrence at institutional level. It also has a duty to apply appropriate sanctions against those accused of sexual harassment. This initiative requires the involvement and participation of all members of the University community. Every individual must take reasonable measures to prevent the occurrence or perpetuation of sexual harassment at the University.
In January 2009, an Adhoc Committee was appointed to develop a sexual harassment policy for the University. This document is a culmination of several discussions and consultations involving the University community and other relevant stakeholders. It is an important document that should be disseminated as widely as possible. It is expected that this document will clarify many issues surrounding sexual harassment and assist both members of staff and students to operate in a free atmosphere that enhances the core values and academic agenda of the University.
The Committee is greatly thanked for undertaking this noble task and so are all individuals and interest groups that participated, contributed or supported the development process of this document. The development process of the policy on sexual harassment was informed by reference to similar policies obtaining at the University of Cape Town, the University of Colorado, the Carnegie Mellon University and the Indiana University. The University is indebted to this reference that greatly contributed to the substance and content of this document. Equally, we express profound gratitude to the Norwegian Students' and Academics' International Assistance Fund (SAIH) for their financial support towards the printing of this Policy.
Prof. Stephen Simukanga Vice-Chancellor Lusaka.
Januarv 2010
 
Paqe i
Table of Contents
 
Page
Foreword	 	 	i
Preamble	 	 	iii
Definition of Terms	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	iii
1.0	INTRODUCTION		
	1.1	Background	 	 	1
	1.2	Policy Statement	 	 	 	 	 	2
	1.3	The Context	 	 	2
2.0	REPORTING PROCEDURES		
	2.1	Reporting Office	 	 	 	 	 	5
	2.2	Advisory Panel	 	 	 	5
	2.3	Process	 	 	6
3.0	INTERVENTION PROCEDURES		
	3.1	Informal Procedure	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	7
	3.2	Formal Procedure	 	 	 	 	 	 	8
	3.3	Sanction	 	 	9
4.0	IMPLEMENTATION		
	4.1	Vice-Chancellor	 	9
	4.2	Registrar	 	10
	4.3	Dean of Students	 	10
	4.4	Deans /Directors / University Librarian
4.5	Heads of Departments/ Managers of Units	 	10
	4.6	Third Parties	 	11
	4.7	Monitoring & Evaluation	 	12
5.0	APPROVAL  	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	12
Schedule I	  	Contextual Factors	 	 	 	13
Schedule 11	  	Socio-Cultural Factors	 	 	 	 	 	15
Schedule 111	  	Ethical Principles	 	 	16
 
Preamble
Sexual refers to unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favours and other verbal, visual or physical conduct of a sexual nature, when this conduct explicitly or implicitly affects an individual's employment or studentship, unreasonably interferes with an individual's work or study performance or living conditions, or creates an intimidating, hostile or working, learning or living environment. The University has an affirmative duty to address the issue of sexual harassment in the workplace and educational environment; to devise and adopt appropriate procedures for maintaining a conducive working, learning and living atmosphere free of sexual coercion or intimidation; to investigate claims of sexual harassment; and to take appropriate action for the prevention and redress of this vice at institutional level. All members of the University community are expected to take reasonable measures to prevent the occurrence and shared responsibility to discourage the perpetuation of sexual harassment. This Policy was developed against this background; and it was approved by the University Council on 15th December 2009.
Definition of Terms
Accused refers to a person alleged to have committed an act of sexual harassment under this Policy.
Confidentiality entails ensuring that information is accessible only to those authorised to have access to it.
Disciplinary procedure refers to the disciplinary procedures and guidelines that apply to any category of members of staff and students in the University.
Discrete relationship refers to interpersonal relating or interaction between persons of different social, academic, educational, economic or occupational background; or of different power balance or sphere of influence and gender or sexual orientation.
Indecent exposure refers to any form of conduct described as such under the Laws of Zambia.
Member of staff refers to an employee of the University either on full-time or parttime engagement or a person who has agreed to be bound by the rules and policies of the University relating to employees.
No-contact order refers to a written order intended to protect a victim from sexual harassment, or the possibility of sexual harassment, whether or not a formal disciplinary process is instituted or contemplated.  
 
Peer relationship refers to interpersonal relating and interaction between peers or persons with similar social, academic, educational, economic or occupational background; or of similar power balance or sphere of influence and gender or sexual orientation.
Protective measures refers to the remedial strategies intended to protect the victim such as no-contact orders, change in hall of residence, change of academic class, special leave or leave of absence.
Retaliation refers to retaliatory acts against any member of staff or student who reports an incident of alleged sexual harassment, or any member of staff or student who testifies, assists or participates in a proceeding, investigation or hearing related to such allegations.
Same-sex harassment refers to acts of harassment where the accused and the victim are of the same sex.
Serious misconduct refers to conduct as defined in the approved University code of conduct for members of staff and the general rules and regulations for students.
Sexual harassment refers to unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favours and other verbal, visual or physical conduct of a sexual nature, when this conduct explicitly or implicitly affects an individual's employment or studentship, unreasonably interferes with an individual's work or study performance or living conditions, or creates an intimidating, hostile or offensive working, learning or living environment.
Student refers to a registered student of the University pursuing studies at undergraduate or graduate level or a person who has agreed to be bound by the rules and policies of the University relating to students.
Supportive measures refers to the remedial strategies intended to support the victim of sexual harassment such as cnsis counselling, emergency medical services, para-legal advice and reporting to relevant authorities.
Third party refers to persons or contracting firms engaged to provide goods and services to the University on contract basis as Independent entities, not being employees or students of the University.
Tribal cousin t-efers to interpersonal relationships between tribes or clans with tradi tionally incìined underpinnings such as intermarriage or historical infighting for land or supremacy or recognition.
University refers to the University of Zambia.
Victim refers to a person who lodges omplaint under this Policy, or a person against whom an act of sexual harassmei ¥fined in this Policy has allegedly been perpetrated.
 
1.0 INTRODUCTION
1.1 Background
The mission statement of the University articulated in the 2008-2012 Strategic Plan is that the University shall be "a centre of excellence in higher education for individuals, industry and society through the provision of quality education, research and scholarly programmes for strategic human resource development, in order to promote national and regional development, through relevant and appropriate partnerships". The central theme in this mission statement is the value of equal opportunity for all individuals in the deliverance or acquisition of university education and human resource development regardless of their socio-econormc, gender, religious or political inclination.
Baseline study findings and anecdotal inference clearly indicate that sexual harassment is an emerging concern at the University. Both members of staff and students have reported experiencing sexual harassment. There are overt and covert implications of sexual harassment, both on the parties concerned and the institution. Sexual harassment subverts the mission of the University and threatens employment expectations of the members of staff and educational goals of the students. Sexual harassment generates psychological trauma with off-shoots of victimization, stigmatisation, discrimination, isolation, ridicule and withdrawal. The stress and anxiety associated with impending disciplinary action or litigation is insurmountable. This may adversely impair work or study performance, breed acrimony and animosity, cause emotional disturbance, and create poor interpersonal relationships and living conditions.
When, through fear of retaliation, a member of staff or student submits or is pressured to submit to unwanted or unwelcome sexual activities, the University's ability to implement its mission is undermined or compromised and its reputation lowered. Sexual harassment may breed a hostile environment with diminishing returns on work output on the part of members of staff and academic achievement or poor living conditions on the part of students.
The focus of this Policy is on the prevention and management of sexual harassment at institutional level. It should be understood in the context of other University policies and statements, including the approved codes of conduct for members of staff and students; and of specific laws governing the education and labour practice as well as any other relevant legal instruments in Zambia. This Policy is designed to protect all members of staff and students, including third parties. It applies to peer relationships (i.e. student/ student or staff/ staff) as well as to discrete relationships (i.e. superior/ subordinate or staff/ student). Equally, it applies to all individuals who are members of the University community, regardless of their socio-economic, political, religious, sex or gender orientation.
1.2 Policy Statement
The University is committed to the maintenance of a working, learning and living environment free from sexual harassment. The University is dedicated to the free exchange of ideas and the intellectual development of all members of its community. For this exchange and development to take place freely, the University promotes the confidence to work, study, innovate, and function without fear of sexual harassment. Furthermore, the University is committed to providing an institutional framework where both members of staff and students may pursue their careers, duties, studies and other academic activities free from sexual harassment. Sexual harassment shall constitute serious misconduct.
Vision
The University has an affirmative duty to address the issue of sexual harassment and to devise appropriate preventive and educative measures for the mitigation against its occurrence at institutional level.
Objectives
a)	To devise appropriate procedures for maintaining a conducive work and study environment free from sexual harassment at the University.
b)	To take appropriate action for the prevention and redress of sexual harassment at the University.
c)	To provide information on the challenges and implications of sexual harassment to members of the University community.
1.3 The Context
In the context of this Policy sexual harassment is prohibited. Perpetration of sexual harassment shall result in disciplinary action. The University will not tolerate sexual harassment among its members of staff and students, including third parties engaged to provide contractual services. Any person who has been made to have sex in return for favours such as offer of employment, promotion, job security or improved grades or academic achievement may report the same as sexual harassment. This also applies to an individual who is threatened or intimidated to succumb to sexual favours in return for improved work conditions or academic achievement. A single incident of unwelcome sexual conduct could constitute sexual harassment. Previous consensual participation in sexual conduct does not mean that the conduct continues to be welcome.
The University community comprises people of diverse social, educational, economic, political and religious backgrounds and divergent interests. The belief and principles about acceptable or unacceptable, wanted or unwanted and right or wrong conduct differ in many cultures and societies, Including the University community.
However, the assessment of conduct that constitutes sexual harassment shall be informed by the context (refer to Schedule I) and socio-cultural factors (refer to Schedule Il) as well as its severity and persistence or frequency.
Unless otherwise indicated, in this Policy the person tzporting sexual harassment shall be referred to as "victim", whereas the person alleged to have committed sexual harassment shall be referred to as "accused".
1.3.1 Conduct is considered sexual harassment if:
a)	it is unwanted, uninvited, improper and offensive Of coercive to the victim;
b)	it is perceived by the victim as demeaning, compromising embarrassing, threatening or offensive;
c)	the victim's refusal or acceptance influence the decisions concerning her/his employment or study programme or offer of campus accommodation; Of
d)	the conduct creates an intimidating, threatening, humiliating and hostile working or learning or living environment for the victim.
1.3.2. Conduct of a sexual nature, is when:
a)	submission to such conduct is made either explicitly or implicitly a condition of a member of staffs employment or promotion, the student's admission or academic progression and/or of obtaining special favours from another student;
b)	rejection of such conduct by a member of staff is used as the basis for non renewal of contract or promotion and the student's poor academic progression or strained interactional relationships;
c)	submission or rejection of such conduct by a student is used as the basis for perpetual intimidation or exploitation or outright blackmail; and
d)	such conduct has the purpose or effect of unreasonable interference with an individual's work or study performance or creating an intimidating and hostile working, learning or living environment.
1.3.3. Conduct of sexual harassment includes physical, visual and verbal actions.
a)	Physical sexual conduct ranges from touching to sexual intercourse and assault.
b)	Visual sexual conduct includes gestures, indecent exposure and the displax sending by electronic or other means sexually explicit pictures, messages,  or devices.
 
c)	Verbal sexual conduct includes innuendos, suggestions or hints of a sexual nature, sexual advances, sexual threats, comments with sexual overtones, sexrelated jokes or insults, graphic comments about a person's body, inappropriate enquiries about a person's sex life, and the sending by electronic means or otherwise of sexually explicit text, images or pictures.
1.3.4. Sexual Harassment may take the form of special victimization, compensatory harassment and of a hostile environment.
a)	Special victimization occurs when a person is victimized or intimidated for failing to submit to sexual advances.
b)	Compensatory harassment occurs when the accused:
i)	influences or attempts to influence a persont s employment circumstances by coercing or attempting to coerce that person to engage in sexual activities; or
ii)	influences or attempts to influence the admission of a student to the University or to halls of residence or a student's access to training, organizational or funding opportunities; or interferes in the evaluation by coercing or attempting to coerce a student to engage In sexual activities.
c)	Creation of a hostile environment occurs where the purpose or effect is to interfere with an individual's performance at work or study programme; or when students engage in conjugal relationships in study rooms without regard of the feelings and rights of roommates.
The determination of whether an environment is hostile must be based on factors such as the frequency of the conduct, its severity, and its threatening, humiliating or intimidating nature.
  1.3.5. For an action to be deemed sexual harassment it must meet these criteria:
a)	It is related to sex or sexual conduct;
b)	It is unwelcome, not reciprocated or not mutual;
c)	It adversely affects the terms of employment or conditions of the study programme;
d)	It unreasonably interferes with work or academic performance or living conditions; and
e)	It explicitly creates an intimidating, hostile or offensive working, learning or living environment.
 
2.0 REPORTING PROCEDURES
2.1 Reporting Office
a)	The Registrar (or a nominee) shall provide a comprehensive sexual harassment response for the University. This will include the provision of supportive and protective measures to the victim (whether or not'disciplinary proceedings are instituted); follow up on concluded cases and reports of retaliation; as well as administrative systems to support the implementation process.
b)	While the primary aim of this Policy is to assist the victim who alleges sexual harassment, an accused person may at any stage approach the Registrar for advice on the application and interpretation of this Policy. In such instances, the Registrar shall:
i)	Provide the accused with a copy of this Policy and of the University's staff or student disciplinary procedures;
ii)	Advise the accused of her/his right to obtain legal representation and of the availability of counselling; and iii) Explain to the accused the protective measures available to the complainant.
2.2Advisory Panel
a)	With respect to any report of sexual harassment made under this Policy, the ViceChancellor may appoint an Advisory Panel.
b)	Inter alia, the Advisory Panel shall assist with information gathering; interviewing the parties; and making recommendations to the Vice-Chancellor on whether or not the case be subjected to Informal procedure, formal procedure, or dismissed for lack of merit. This role shall apply in conformity with the approved disciplinary procedures of the University.
c)	The Advisory Panel, whose composition based on the principle of gender balancing and professional diversity, shall include the following persons:
i)	the Union/Association representing a victim ;
ii)	a representative of the Dean/Director/University Librarian, if the victim or accused is a member of the academic staff;
iii)	a representative of the Registrar, if the victim or accused is a member of nonacademic staff;
iv)	a nominee by the Vice-Chancellor, if the victim or accused is a nonrepresented member of staff;
v)	a representative of the Dean of Students, if the victim or accused is a student;
 
vi)	a representative of the Students Union, if the victim or accused is a student; and
vii)	a person, not necessarily a member of staff of the University, with expert knowledge in law.
d)	The Advisory Panel may not make decisions on behalf of a victim nor give advice in a manner that might be construed as prescriptive unduly influenced by the victim.
e)	At the conclusion of the interview process by the Advisory Panel, a written report with a statement of factual findings and determination of whether this Policy has been violated shall be submitted to the Vice-Chancellor.
2.3 Process
a)	Complaints of sexual harassment must be brought to the attention of the Registrar as soon as is reasonably possible, either by the victim or any other person.
b)	If a complaint is brought to the attention of the Head of Department or Manager of Unit, that person shall notify the Registrar immediately. However, if the incident is of a serious nature, the victim should be encouraged to inform the  Registrar in person.
c)	All complaints of sexual harassment shall be made as promptly as feasible after the occurrence, preferably within thirty (30) days after the incident.
d)	Any complaint of sexual harassment will be recorded in writing (or audio taped) by the Registrar.
e)	The steps to be taken on receipt of a complaint should include, but are not limited to, the following:
i)	explain the formal and informal procedures to the victim;
ii)	advise the victim that she/he may choose which procedure should be followed by the University;
iii)	reassure the victim that she/he will not face any adverse consequences in choosing to follow either the formal or informal procedure;
iv)	advise the victim that she/he is not bound by the outcome of the informal procedure and will have the right to appeal directly to the Vice-Chancellor within seven (7) days of the conclusion of that process;
v)	advise the victim that the matter will be dealt with confidentially; and
 
vi)	provide the victim with information about counselling services available in the University as well as information on how to access counselling services or legal advice outside the University.
f)	If a victim, after consultation with the counsellor, does not wish to pursue the matter any further, the same shall be reported to the Registrar and the matter concluded thereof.
g)	All complaints of a serious nature shall be referred to an Advisory Panel who shall review the complaint with respect to:
i)	the risk to other persons in the University; ii) the severity of the incident; and
iii) the history of the accused with regard to previous cases of sexual harassment or complaints of retaliation.
h)	If it appears to the Registrar and the Advisory Panel that there is a significant risk of harm to other persons, they may recommend for a formal procedure. In such an event, the victim must be advised accordingly and the Registrar must prepare a written recommendation to the Vice-Chancellor.
3.0 INTERVENTION PROCEDURES
The principles that shall govern all procedures under this Policy are reflected in Schedule Ill. The intervention shall be achieved on a case-by-case basis.
3.1 Informal Procedure
a)	An informal procedure is a process, managed by the Registrar, in which  relationships between the victim and accused are explored with the consent of both, the aim of which is to reach resolution of a complaint in a manner that is satisfactory to them without recourse to formal procedures.
b)	The victim has the right to pursue formal proceedings after the conclusion of informal proceedings. The choice to pursue Informal proceedings shall not in any way diminish the seriousness of the original complaint.
c)	The accused has the right to refuse participation in informal proceedings, and may exercise this right during any stage of the informal process. No negative inference shall be drawn from refusal to consider, participate or withdraw from the informal process.
d)	An informal procedure may be followed by a formal procedure if the Registrar in consultation with the Advisory Panel believes that there are compelling reasons for doing so.
e)	Informal proceedings require the written consent of both the victim and the accused, provided that:
  the availability and implications of informal proceêdings shall be explained to the victim and the accused;
> preparatory interviews with the accused may be held in the absence of the victim and with any other persons that may provide information to assist with the informal process; and
> the structure, procedure and facilitation of any informal procedure will be by mutual consent of all concerned parties (i.e. Registrar, victim and accused).
f)	The informal procedure may include:
> A discussion with the accused (with or without revealing the identity of the victim, depending on their choice) regarding certain forms of conduct that constitute the violation of this Policy;
  A discussion where the objective is to give the accused an opportunity to apologise. The terms, conditions and acceptance of such an apology will be facilitated by the Registrar; and
  Presentation of the case in confidence to the Advisory Panel to consider options and to make recommendations that may achieve a resolution based on mutual agreement between the concerned parties.
g)	The process and outcome of an informal procedure must be recorded and reported accordingly.
h)	The informal procedure shall be concluded within thirty (30) days of the incident being reported to the Registrar.
3.2 Formal Procedure
a)	A victim may choose to initiate formal proceedings, either with or without first following an informal procedure. The purpose of formal proceedings is to subject the victim's allegations through the disciplinary process.
b)	If the victim wishes to proceed with a formal procedure, she/he shall advise the Registrar of this, and prepare a written statement providing full particulars of the alleged misconduct.
 
Paqe 8
c)	If a victim, following an informal procedure that does not result in a mutually acceptable outcome, does not wish to follow a formal procedure, the Registrar will establish whether the victim requires any further advice or supportive measures.
d)	Where the formal procedure is to be followed, the åpproved existing University disciplinary procedures for members of staff and students should be applied.
e)	The formal procedure shall be concluded within fourteen (14) days from the date of commencement of this process.
f)	In the case of third parties, the disciplinary procedures agreed between the University and the third party will apply. The Registrar will offer such assistance and guidance to the management of the third party concerned as may be required.
3.3 Sanction
Appropriate sanctions will be imposed for violation of this Policy, depending on the circumstances and gravity of the violation. The sanctions may range from no-contact order to reprimand, suspension, dismissal or expulsion. For members of staff, this will be in conformity with the provisions of the legal framework governing the University and the approved code of conduct; and for students, this will be in conformity with the provisions of the approved general rules and regulations.
4.0 IMPLEMENTATION
The implementation plan of this Policy shall take place at various levels and involve many interest groups within the University community. It shall largely be preventive and educative in orientation. The University community must be adequately sensitized on the content, procedures and sanctions pertaining to this Policy. The most prominent organs in the implementation process are:
4.1 Vice-Chancellor
The Vice-Chancellor shall:
a)	Take all reasonable steps to communicate this Policy to all members of staff and students of the University and to raise awareness about the need to prevent or/and report sexual harassment and incidents of retaliation.
b)	Disseminate this Policy widely and provide regular information on its implementation.
 
c)	Report annually to the University Council on the implementation of this Policy.
4.2 Registrar
The Registrar shall:
a)	Provide the Public Relations Office with information that will enable the University community to be adequately informed and sensitized on the contents of this Policy and its implementation.
b)	Communicate to all members of staff, students and third parties at least once a year reminding them about this Policy.
c)	Provide mechanisms for follow up on reported cases of sexual harassment and incidents of retaliation.
d)	Provide a training forum for members of staff to enhance their knowledge and understanding of the contents of this Policy and its implementation.
e)	Provide a framework for the implementation, monitoring and evaluation of this Policy.
f)	Report bi-annually to the Vice-Chancellor on the implementation of this Policy.
4.3 Dean of Students
The Dean of Students shall:
a)	Communicate regularly by written and oral means the seriousness of sexual harassment and the existence of this Policy and its salient features to members of staff, students and third parties within halls of residence.
b)	Communicate by written and oral means the contents of this Policy to the Students' Union, Council of Hall Representatives, registered student organizations and the student populace.
c)	Provide an orientation and sensitization forum for all students to enhance their knowledge and understanding of the contents of this Policy and its implementation.
4.4 Deans/Directors/University Librarian
The Deans/Directors/University Librarian shall:
a)	Communicate regularly by written and oral means the seriousness of sexual harassment and the existence of this Policy and its salient features to members of staff, students and third parties within their Schools [Institutes/Directorates and Library.
b)	Communicate regularly with Heads of Departments and Managers of Units in the Schools/ Institutes/ Directorates and Library concerning their responsibilities in the implementation of this Policy.
4.5 Heads of Departments and Managers of Units	 
a)	The Head of Department or Manager of Unit shall take all reasonable steps to create and maintain an environment that is free from sexual harassment. In this regard, the Heads of Departments and Managers of Units are required to:
i)	Exercise leadership by knowing and understanding the contents of this Policy; ii) Assume responsibility for implementing this Policy;
iii)	Communicate by written and oral means the contents of this Policy to all members of staff, students and third parties in their respective areas of responsibility; and
iv)	Ensure that all new members of staff, students and third parties in their respective departments or units are adequately informed about this Policy and its implementation.
b)	The Head of Department or Manager of Unit shall take appropriate action when instances of sexual harassment occur and act in accordance with the reporting and disciplinary procedures laid down in this Policy. In this regard, the Heads of Departments and Managers of Units are required to:
i)	Treat all complaints of sexual harassment as confidential; ii) Treat all parties with dignity and respect; iii) Refer all complaints of sexual harassment to the Registrar; iv) Take steps to prevent sexual harassment from occurring; and
v) Report the matter to the Registrar should any conduct in breach of this Policy be observed and no complaint lodged.
4.6Third Parties
a)	While the University has no jurisdiction over third parties who are neither students nor employees of the University, it is anticipated that this Policy will be upheld and respected by all who work at, or visit, the University or who take part in the University's activities at any location.
b)	Third parties who are neither registered students nor employees of the University are expected to abide by the provisions of this Policy.
 
4.7 Monitoring and Evaluation
Incidents of sexual harassment or retaliation shall be monitored and reported appropriately at the various levels, i.e. schools, directorates, institutes, departments and units of the University on a case-by-case basis. The reports will be submitted to the Registrar regularly as they occur. The Registrar shall submit a comprehensive report bi-annually to the Vice-Chancellor who, in turn, shall report to the University Council.
5.0 APPROVAL
The Sexual Harassment Policy is one of the policies enunciated by the University. It shall be revised periodically depending on need, time and circumstances through the normal procedures. This Policy, and any subsequent versions thereof, shall become effective from the date of approval by the University Council. 
Scheduler: CONTEXTUAL FACTORS
The under-listed are some of the circumstances and situations that may constitute sexual harassment in peer or discrete relationships at the University. However, this list is not exhaustive.
1.0 Staff/ Staff
1.1 When a senior member of staff seeks sexual advances or favours from a junior member of staff with a view to approving renewal of contract or express processing of salary-related and other payments or dues.
1.2 When a junior member of staff seeks sexual advances or favours from a senior member of staff with a view to getting approval of renewal of contract or express processing of salary-related and other payments or dues.
1.3 When a member of staff persistently visits an office of a colleague with a view to obtaining sexual advances or favours.
1.4 When a senior member of staff persistently visits an office of a junior member of staff with a view to obtaining sexual advances or favours, or vice versa.
1.5 When a member of staff deliberately dresses or conducts her/himself in such a manner so as to attract or entice the opposite sex to make sexual advances at them.
1.6	When a member of staff is made to have sex against her/his will by a colleague.
1.7 When a junior member of staff is made to have sex against her/his will by a senior member of staff, or vice versa.
1.8 When a member of staff is exposed to verbal, visual or physical conduct of a sexual nature in the office or work-site by a colleague.
1.9 When a senior member of staff is exposed to verbal, visual or physical conduct of a sexual nature in the class or office by a junior member of staff, or vice versa.
1.10 When a member of staff deliberately claims to have been sexually harassed by a colleague with a view to embarrassing him/her or making him/her succumb to his/her sexual and material demands, or outright blackmail.
2.0 Staff/ Student
21. 	When a student is made to have sex against hi a member of staff, or vtce versa.
 
 
2.2 When a member of staff deliberately gives low grades or fail a student who refuses to succumb to advances of a sexual nature.
2.3	When a member of staff deliberately dresses or conducts her/himself in such a manner so as to attract Of entice a student to make sexual advances at them, or vice versa.
2.4 When a student persistently visits an office of a member of staff with a view to obtaining sexual advances or favours.
2.5 When a member of staff persistently requests a student to visit his / her office with a view to seeking sexual advances or favours.
2.6	When a member of staff is exposed to verbal, visual or physical conduct of a sexual nature in class or office by a student, or vice versa.
2.7 When a student deliberately claims to have been sexually harassed by a member of staff with a view to embarrassing him/her or making him/her succumb to his /her sexual and material demands, or outright blackmail.
3.0 Student/ Student
3.1 When a student deliberately claims to have been sexually harassed by a colleague with a view to embarrassing him/her or making him/her succumb to his/her sexual and material demands, or outright blackmail.
3.2 When a student deliberately dresses or conducts her/ himself in such a manner so as to attract or entice a colleague to make sexual advances at them.
3.3	When a student is made to have sex against her/his will by a colleague; or pervasive encounters.
3.4 When a student is exposed to verbal, visual or physical conduct of a sexual nature in class ot hostel by a colleague.
3.5 When a student persistently visits a room of a colleague with a view to obtaining sexual advances ot favours.
4.0 Student/Third Party
4.1	When a student deliberately behaves in such a manner so as to entice or attract or force sexual advances upon a third party, or vice versa.
4.2	When a student deliberately behaves in such a manner so as to entice or attract or force sexual advances at employees or students of an outside work-site or study-site where the University enjoys collaborative partnerships in the deliverance of its mission or academic agenda.
 
Schedule 11: SOCIO-CULTURAL FACTORS
1.	Perceptions of what constitutes sexual harassment differ among women and men. What is regarded as acceptable sexual behaviour by some people, others might consider it sexual harassment.
2.	In majority instances, the accused is expected to be male; or a person with a privileged position and exerts a lot of pressure on'the female or male victim.
3.	Society generally views sexual behaviour (i.e. casual or extra marital sex) by men as normal and the same is not condemned as immoral. The opposite is true for women.
4.	Sexual advances by men are considered as normal, and women are expected to submit after sustained pressure although they are not under obligation to do so if they really do not want the proposition. In stances of this nature, men ought to be mindful that a woman's "no" to their proposition simply means that and they should accept it as such.
5.	Society blames women and girls for provoking sexual harassment (through dress, beauty or behaviour construed to be inviting men) and for reaping the consequences of the perceived bad conduct. Generally, women are viewed as sexual objects that must be exploited by men.
6.	Women are more likely to accept sexual harassment when the same is advanced under pretext of "tribal cousin". Tribal cousinship makes it socially acceptable to be harassed by either group and none takes offence in cases where sexual harassment occurs. However, there are extremes when the same may be regarded intolerable and offensive.
7.	The University has its own hidden or silent norms, sub-cultures and orientations which allow or tolerate high levels of permissiveness, expressed freedoms, rights and privileges. Some people (i.e. both members of staff and students) may allow or tolerate sexual harassment in exchange for rewards such as improved academic progression, passing with flying colours, offer of hostel accommodation, accelerated promotion and material gain.
8.	In many instances, sexual harassment is not reported because of:    fear of blame from friends, family and others;   damage to personal reputation and integrity;   fear of getting low or fail grades;   fear of retaliation;   fear of embarrassing the accused (because she/he is supervisor, lecturer or fellow student) ;   fear of personal embarrassment;
  Inertia that no corrective action would be taken; and   protecting the accused's job or career.
 
Page 15
exua arassment Policy
 ETHICAL PRINCIPLES
The following principles shall govern all procedures under this Policy.
1.	Procedures are to be impartial and fair and consistent, both in substance and perception, to all concerned parties (i.e. the victim and accused and witnesses).
2.	All concerned parties are to be treated with respect and dignity.
3.	The privacy, autonomy and reputational interests of all concerned parties must be assured.
4.	All relevant investigations must be conducted promptly and thoroughly.
5.	Confidentiality of information relating to reports or investigations or cases of misconduct must be maintained.
6.	Shared confidentiality shall be encouraged amongst individuals charged with the responsibility to implement this Policy and those who have a "need to know" in order to effect the relevant sanctions.
7.	Action that constitutes misconduct will be determined on a case-by-case basis from the available facts and the context in which the alleged misconduct occurred.
8.	Informal resolution of alleged misconduct is very important and should be encouraged.
9.	When a formal complaint is processed, both parties must be provided access to all charges, claims and other relevant information.
10.	When a case of misconduct has been proven, disciplinary measures should be taken through the appropriate disciplinary procedures of the University.
11.	Relevant concerned parties shall be informed of the outcome of any investigation and intervention procedures.
12.	No-£ontact orders shall be issued by the Vice- Chancellor (or a nominee) ur,0fi recommendation by the Registrar.
 t violation of this Policy for anyone to intentionally either make a false complaint or knowingly provide false information regarding a complaint.
Copies of this Policy can be obtained from:
The Registrar,
University of Zambia, P.O. Box 32379, Lusaka.
Funded by:
SRIHI Norwegian Students' and Academics'
International Assistance Fund
Printed by:
 

 
 
THE UNIVERSITY OF ZAMBIA
 
August 2019
Copyright © University of Zambia, 2019
Published by the University of Zambia (Council Office)
P.O. Box 32379
Lusaka - Zambia
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Foreword..................................................................................................................................................................i Working Definitions................................................................................................................................................ii Acronyms and  Abbreviations................................................................................................................................iii
PART 1: WHISTLEBLOWING POLICY..........................................................................................................iv
1.0    INTRODUCTION...........................................................................................................................................1 2.0    SITUATION ANALYSIS................................................................................................................................1 3.0   VISION, MISSION AND CORE VALUES....................................................................................................2 3.1  Vision …………………...................................................................................................................................2
3.2  Mission……………………..……….................….............................................................................2
3.3  Core Values …………………….....……………...............................................................................2
4.0 	POLICY STATEMENT ………….............................................................................................................2  	4.1   Policy Goal ………………………………........…........................................................................…2  	4.2   Policy Objectives ………................................................................………………........…...............2 5.0 	SCOPE …………………………………….........………...................................................................…...2 6.0 	POLICY STRATEGIES ……………………........…...............................................................…....….…3 7.0 	POLICY DIRECTION ……………………….......……....................................................................…...3 8.0 	IMPLEMENTATION FRAMEWORK ……........…….......................................................................…..3  	8.1   Institutional Framework ………….....…........………...................................................................…3 9.0 	LEGAL FRAMEWORK ………………...............................................................……........…….….......4 10.0 	MONITORING,   EVALUATION    AND    REVIEW     	OF   THE    POLICY ……………………….............................................................................................4 11.0 	POLICY      DEVELOPMENT        PROCEDURE ….............................................................................4
PART II:  WHISTLEBLOWING PROCEDURES ….........……......................................................................5
12.0 	REPORTING PROCEDURES …………………......................................................................................6 13.0 	REPORTING IN GOOD FAITH ………................................................................………........….....…..7 14.0 	CONTACT PROCEDURES.......................................................................................................................7 15.0 	ANONYMITY......………..........................................................................................................................7 16.0 	APPEAL PROCESS ……....…………................................................................……………..................7 17.0 	PROTECTION ……………………………............................……………................……..................…7 18.0 DATA PROTECTION AND PRIVACY ……………................................……………............................8 19.0 FURTHER INFORMATION ………………………...................................……………..........................8 APPENDIX - MANAGEMENT OF INVESTIGATIONS .......................................………...……..................9
 
FOREWORD 
The University of Zambia is committed to the highest possible standards of ethical, moral and legal business conduct. In line with this commitment and the University’s commitment to open communication, this policy aims to provide an avenue for employees to raise concerns and reassurance that they will be protected from reprisals or victimisation for whistleblowing in good faith. 
The diversity and complexity in the nature of the University’s operations require that every employee contributes to creating a shared culture underpinned by the University values. Therefore, it is the responsibility of each and every member of staff to ensure that we fulfil this commitment and maintain high standards in line with our policies and procedures. 
I, therefore, implore everyone to adhere to the prescribed procedures in this policy so as to promote transparency and accountability in the University.
 
30 / 08 / 19
----------------------------                                                            ---------------------------- 
      Prof Luke E Mumba  	 	                                                                                   Date            	   
    VICE-CHANCELLOR 
WORKING DEFINITIONS
Conduct:   	Means moral principles that govern a person’s behaviour or the conducting of an activity.
Discrimination: 	Means the unjust or prejudicial treatment of different categories of people or things especially on grounds of race, age or sex.
Ethics: 	Means moral beliefs and rules about right and wrong.
Fairness: 	Means to impartial or just treatment or behaviour without favouritism or discrimination. 
Favouritism: 	Means the practice of giving unfair preferential treatment to one person or group at the expense of another.
Fraud: 	Means wrongful or criminal deception intended to result in financial or personal gain.
Mission: 	Means the fundamental purpose of the University that describes the reason of its existence, what it does and how it does its business to achieve its vision.
Principal Officers: Means a category of staff in Executive Management at the University of Zambia who include, the Vice-Chancellor, Deputy Vice-Chancellor, Registrar, Bursar, Dean of Students and Librarian.
Unfairness: 	Means lack of equity and justice.
University Values: Means  core and governing beliefs, through which the University will behave, make decisions and relate with its client and society at large during the implementation of the Strategic Plan.
Victimisation: 	Means the action of singling someone out for cruel or unjust treatment.
Vision: 	Means long term projection and desire of what the University would like to be in the higher education and knowledge environment.
Whistleblowing:  	Means the disclosure of information which relates to suspected wrong-doing 
which could be breach of a legal, statutory or regulatory requirements or unethical, immoral behaviour.
ACRONYMS AND ABBREVIATIONS
AC 	 	: 	Audit Committee 
ACC 	 	: 	Anti-Corruption Commission 
CIA 	 	: 	Chief Internal Auditor
DEC 	 	:  	Drug Enforcement Commission
UNZA  	: 	University of Zambia
VC 	 	: 	Vice-Chancellor 
WBC  	: 	Whistleblowing Committee
WO 	 	:          Whistleblowing Officer
ZP   	 	: 	Zambia Police Service
 
PART 1: WHISTLEBLOWING POLICY.
 
1.0 	 INTRODUCTION
The University of Zambia (UNZA) has developed this Whistleblowing Policy to show its commitment to transparent and accountable management. This policy is intended to encourage staff to disclose information that they believe shows misconduct, unethical conduct or illegal practices in the workplace, without being victimised in any way. This includes protecting staff from any victimisation or discrimination if they do report (i.e. ‘blow the whistle on’) improper or illegal conduct within the University.   
The aim of this policy is to ensure that all cases of suspected wrong-doing are reported and managed in a timely and appropriate manner so as to promote good governance, high compliance levels, excellence and ethical conduct among staff, students and all stakeholders.
Further, this policy provides a framework for an internal mechanism of reporting, investigating and remedying any wrongdoing in the workplace. In most cases, staff should not find it necessary to alert anyone externally. However, the law recognises that in some circumstances it may be appropriate for staff to report their concerns to an external body such as the Zambia Police (ZP), Anti-Corruption Commission (ACC) and the Drug Enforcement Commission (DEC). This policy would encourage staff, students and other stakeholders not to rush to report to the media but rather use this policy as an established channel of reporting.
As part of the University of Zambia’s commitment to its core values of integrity and accountability, it maintains an open culture of governance where staff, students and other stakeholders can report as soon as possible any legitimate concerns in confidence in every area of its operations. This policy reflects the legal protection given to staff under the Public Interest Disclosure (Protection of Whistleblowers) Act Number 4 of 2010 of the Laws of Zambia. As such, the University of Zambia recognises the importance for these same standards to apply wherever UNZA workers are in the country.
This policy applies equally to all employees, students, consultants, contractors, volunteers, casual workers of UNZA regardless of seniority or length of service. 
2.0 SITUATION ANALYSIS
Globally, having a Whistleblowing Policy is considered as a best practice in ensuring transparency and accountability in an organisation. In the case of UNZA, it shall provide an environment which encourages members of staff, students and other stakeholders to make good faith reports of suspected fraud, corruption, or unethical conduct in the University.
A written formal policy, if properly communicated is an effective means of preventing and deterring misconduct that might be contemplated but has not yet taken place. It is also a transparent method of addressing issues relating to whistleblowing, such as answering standard questions, giving assurances, providing information, and offering explanations. 
Since inception in 1966, the University of Zambia had never had a written Whistleblowing Policy that would promote transparency and accountability. The University Staff and other stakeholders have previously relied on anonymous letters in trying to report unethical conduct in the University. However, this is not an appropriate and effective way of promoting whistleblowing as indicated above. 
In addition, the absence of a Whistleblowing Policy resulted in the University community and other stakeholders to resort to reporting perceived misconduct through social media platforms. 
In view of the foregoing and in order to promote transparency, good governance and whistleblowers protection, the University has embarked on the formulation of this policy.
3.0  VISION, MISSION AND CORE VALUES
The Whistleblowing Policy is premised on the University’s vision, mission and core values. 
3.1   Vision 
An eminent University driven by pursuit of knowledge, innovation and social responsiveness.
3.2   Mission 
To provide relevant, innovative and demand-driven higher education for socio-economic development. 
3.3   Core Values 
The University of Zambia’s core values are Academic Freedom; Excellence; Innovativeness; Eco-Friendliness; Integrity; and Equity. 
4.0  POLICY STATEMENT
The University of Zambia is committed to operating lawfully with whoever it deals with, in an ethical manner and with integrity in accordance with values and management philosophy as outlined in the University of Zambia Strategic Plan 2018 - 2022.  It is, therefore, the responsibility of the entire University community to ensure that this commitment is fulfilled.  However, from time to time there may be situations where the right course of action is unclear, or there may be situations where there is suspicion or knowledge of an improper, unethical or inappropriate or unlawful conduct.  The University has both a legal and moral duty to take corrective measures to identify such situations and make every effort to remedy them.
Whereas it is acknowledged that it is sometimes difficult to know when to speak out about something that concerns the University, staff, students and other stakeholders shall be brave and courageous to speak out.  Often people are reluctant to get involved but this could result in serious consequences for UNZA and its employees.  Therefore, the institution has put in place this Whistleblowing Policy so that academic staff, or administrative staff, students or any other stakeholders can talk to someone in confidence.
4.1     Policy Goal
The goal of this policy is to promote transparency and adherence to the policies and procedures of the University.
4.2   Policy Objectives
        The objectives of this policy are as follows:
(a)	ensure all employees, students and the public at large feel encouraged and protected to speak out in confidence and reporting matters they suspect may involve anything improper, unethical, inappropriate or illegal;
(b)	encourage identification of improper, unethical or inappropriate and illegal behaviour at all levels of the University;
(c)	provide clear procedures for whistleblowing;
(d)	manage all disclosures in a timely, consistent and professional manner; and
(e)	provide assurance that all disclosures will be taken seriously, treated as confidential and managed without fear of retaliation.
5.0  SCOPE
This policy shall apply to all matters of whistleblowing in the University as defined in this document. These include criminal offences, unfairness and discrimination, criminal negligence, fraud, failure to comply with a legal obligation, miscarriage of justice, endangering the health and safety of any individual, willful damage to the environment and deliberate concealment of information tending to show any of the above.
     Concerns raised under this policy shall relate to UNZA employees and students but may also relate to the actions of a third party, such as a supplier, agent, distributor or joint partner.  It may be appropriate for persons to raise their concerns directly with the third party where they believe that the wrong doing identified or suspected relates solely or mainly to their conduct or is a matter which is their legal responsibility.  However, people should consult the Line Manager before speaking to any third party.
    This policy can be used by any employee or group of employees or students.  In addition, suppliers, customers and other third parties such as agents, or other stakeholders may also use this policy to report suspected wrongdoing.
6.0  POLICY STRATEGIES 
 For this Policy to be effectively implemented, the following strategies shall apply: 
a)	All members of staff, students and other stakeholders shall be sensitised on the policy and reporting procedures.
b)	The policy shall be publicised through the University website and, staff and students emails.
7.0    POLICY DIRECTION
In order to attain the Vision and Mission, the University shall conduct its business in a transparent and accountable manner. The Whistleblowing Policy shall create an environment where staff, students and other stakeholders will be able to make good faith reports of suspected fraud, corruption, or unethical conduct in the Institution.
8.0    IMPLEMENTATION FRAMEWORK
   8.1     Institutional Framework
The Higher Education Act Number 4 of 2013 provides for a primary institutional framework in which management  of resources is highlighted and Part 20 of the University of Zambia financial regulations outlines the responsibility of University staff with regard to safeguarding of institutional assets against losses through wilful negligence, fraud, theft and other illegal intentional conduct. 
8.1.1    Registrar
It shall be the responsibility of the Registrar’s Office to coordinate the whistleblowing process and ensure that all matters reported in good faith are exhaustively dealt with in line with this policy.
8.1.2     Administrative Structures and Arrangements
The administrative structures have been established to support Management 
(Registrar) to manage the university resources on a 
day-to-day basis. For purposes of this policy, there shall be an independent Whistle Blowers Committee (WBC) appointed by management to oversee its implementation. The Committee shall become a sub-Committee of Audit Committee of Council which shall meet as and when cases arise.  This will comprise the following membership:
i.	Audit Committee Member  	-    Chairperson
ii.	Risk Manager 	 	 	-     Member iii. Chief Internal Auditor 	 	-     Member iv. Legal Counsel 	 	 	-     Member
	v.  Director, Quality Assurance  	-     Secretariat
9.0  LEGAL FRAMEWORK
This Policy has been developed in line with the pertinent national instrument which is to be applied or referred to in the management and implementation of this policy  ‘The Public Interest Disclosure (Protection of Whistle Blowers) Act number 4 of 2010’ of the Laws of Zambia and other Institutional policies.  The Act provides that ‘An employer shall not subject an employee to any detriment on account, or partly on account, of having made a protected disclosure or public interest disclosure’ and that ‘Any person may make a public interest disclosure to an investigating authority’.
UNZA has other policies and procedures that deal with complaints, critical or constructive comments, and appeals. The Disciplinary, Grievance, Harassment and Equal Opportunities policies also address standards of behaviour at work.  The relevant policy should be followed where appropriate.In addition, Management has developed policies to guide members of staff in the running of the University. 
The following institutional policies and frameworks should be referred to in this regard:
(a)	Staff Disciplinary and Grievance Procedure Code;
(b)	Financial Regulations;
(c)	Accounting Procedures Manual;
(d)	Procurement Policy; (e)  Asset Management Policy and (f)  Risk Management Policy.
10.0    MONITORING, EVALUATION AND REVIEW OF  THE POLICY
	10.1 	Review
 For successful implementation of  the Whistle blowing Policy, a review framework shall be an integral part of this Policy. This shall be achieved through periodic reports and recommendations prepared by the Registrar’s office and the committee charged with the implementation of this policy. 
	10.2 	Monitoring and Evaluation
For monitoring and evaluation of the effective implementation of this policy document, the Registrars’ office and the committee shall identify and recommend key pertinent areas in this policy document that may require review.   All amendments to this policy shall require approval of the University of Zambia Council.  The Policy shall be reviewed every five years.
11.0   POLICY DEVELOPMENT PROCEDURE
The development of the Policy followed a consultative process with relevant Stakeholders.  The Policy was reviewed by the Senior Management Committee, Policy Formulation and Development Committee and was considered by the University of Zambia Executive Management and approved by the University Council.
PART II: WHISTLE BLOWING PROCEDURES 
12.0    Reporting Procedures
When a matter which is of a public interest occurs, a member of staff, student or any other stakeholder may report this matter to the office responsible for whistleblowing using the laid down procedures. 
12.1 If a member of staff, student or stakeholder believes that a matter or practice within the scope (section 7.0) of this policy is or has been taking place, they should make the disclosure immediately to the Principal Officers.  If the matter or practice is more serious and/or concerns the Principal Officers then it should be reported directly to the Whistleblowers Committee (WBC). Staff and students may also report their concerns confidentially to internalaudit@unza.zm which will be received by the Chief Internal Auditor (CIA) and subsequently the chairperson of the Audit Committee (AC) of the Council of the University of Zambia. Exceptionally, if Whistleblowers believe it is inappropriate for any reason to report the concern(s) to the rest of the Principal Officers, they may report it to either one of the Whistleblower Committee Members (for details, see UNZA website, www.unza.zm [the website would be specifically for five members of the Whistleblower Committee]). An investigation will then take place into the alleged matter or practice.
12.2 For example, there should be written submissions either by use of an email, telephone or post. Whistleblowers can raise their concerns by email, orally or in writing, stating that they are using the Whistleblowing Policy.
It is however preferable that, as much as is possible, anyone reporting any matter include the information below:
(a)	An outline of the known or suspected wrong-doing;
(b)	Details, to the best of their knowledge, about when, where and how it occurred;
(c)	A list of the names of those suspected of being involved (both within UNZA and externally);
(d)	A list of names of anyone who may have relevant information;
(e)	Details of how they came to know about the  suspected activities of the Whistleblower;
(f)	The estimated value of the loss to UNZA and government or other parties;
(g)	What, if any, breaches of internal controls, policy, procedure or other requirements they believe took place;
(h)	The names of anyone who they have discussed or reported this incident to; and (i) The date and time of making the report.
12.3 Once a protected disclosure has been received it will be referred to the Whistle Blowers Committee  giving details of the protected disclosure, including: 
12.3.1.	Date and substance of the protected disclosure 
12.3.2.	Identity and level of seniority of the alleged wrongdoer(s) 
12.3.3.	Level of risk associated with the alleged wrongdoing. 
12.4 The Committee shall decide whether sufficient information exists to allow the allegation(s) to be investigated and, if so, the appropriate process to determine:
12.4.1.	The nature and scope of the investigation; 
12.4.2.	Who will lead the investigation (that person may be external to UNZA); 
12.4.3.	The nature of any technical, financial or legal advice that may be required ;
12.4.4.	A timeframe for the investigation (paying regard to the level of risk) ; and
12.4.5.	Whether any individual(s) under investigation should be suspended as per the University Code of Conduct.  
12.5 The Committee shall also consider the appropriate time to inform any alleged wrongdoer(s) of the investigation process. The University shall also aim to keep the Whistleblower who raised the concern(s) informed of the progress of any investigation and its likely timescale. However, sometimes the need for confidentiality may prevent UNZA from giving specific details of the investigation or any disciplinary action taken as a result. Staff, students and other stakeholders should treat any information about the investigation as confidential.
13.0    Reporting in good faith
If anyone makes an allegation, in utmost good faith, but it is not confirmed by investigation(s), no action shall be taken against such a one.  If however, anyone makes allegations that are malicious or simply to cause anger, irritation or distress, disciplinary action may be taken against such a one in accordance with the Disciplinary Code of Conduct. 
   If any other person other than a UNZA employee, who may have acted with malice, perjury or submitted libelous reports, displinary action may be enforced upon that person. 
14.0    Contact Procedures
It is recognised that, due to the potential sensitivity of the allegation(s), one may not always feel contended about discussing their concerns internally with Line Managers.  As soon as anyone becomes aware of any suspected wrong-doing, they should notify the matter to one of the Officers below:
(a)	The Vice-Chancellor
(b)	Registrar 
(c)	Chief Security Officer
Or UNZA Chief Internal Auditor who can be contacted through internalaudit@unza.zm or directly through the contact details that can be found at the UNZA website – www.unza.zm.
If the disclosure is extremely serious or if notifying any of the Officers above is not possible, inappropriate or would serve no purpose, you should notify the Chairperson of the Audit Committee, whose details can be found at www.unza.zm.
15.0    Anonymity
It is understood that disclosure(s) made under this policy may involve highly confidential and sensitive matters and that they may require to make an anonymous disclosure(s).  When this is the case, the Committee shall endeavour to investigate the concern(s) in full, although a full investigation may be impeded if the University cannot obtain further information from the anonymous whistleblower.
16.0   Appeal Process
Where the Whistleblower is not happy with the outcome of the investigations, they may appeal to University of Zambia Chairperson of Council detailing their concerns.
17.0    Protection
The University of Zambia undertakes that no one who reports any concern(s) under this policy in utmost good faith will be subjected to any detriment for coming forward, regardless of whether or not the concern is ultimately substantiated.  In the event that a whistleblower believes that they are being victimised, or subjected to a detriment by any person within the University as a result of reporting a concern(s) or assisting the University in any investigation under this policy, they must inform the Chairperson of the Audit Committee immediately and appropriate action will be taken to protect them from any reprisal in form of sanctioning the Committee that reveals information to unauthorised persons.
18.0   Data Protection and Privacy
All information shall be treated confidentially as far as is reasonably practicable.  There may be circumstances where(because of the nature of the investigation), it shall be necessary to disclose the whistleblower’s identity.  In such circumstances, every effort shall be made to seek consent from them before such disclosure(s) is or are made.
If it is necessary for the whistleblower to be involved in an investigation (for example by providing evidence), the fact that they made the original disclosure(s), will so far as reasonably practicable be kept confidential,  and all reasonable steps will be taken  to protect them from any victimisation or detriment as a result of having made a disclosure(s).
19.0    Further Information
If one has any questions about the content or application of this policy, they should contact the Chief Internal Auditor whose contact details can be found on www.unza.zm. 
Appendix - Management of Investigations
1. 	Complaint procedure stages
(a)	The Whistleblower Committee shall be responsible for investigating the complaint. 
(b)	Members of the Whistleblower Committee shall undergo appropriate orientation in whistleblowing and/or awareness training on the provisions of the University of Zambia Whistleblowing Procedures. 
(c)	The Whistleblowing Committee shall have access to all relevant documents relating to the complaint and request other written information as appropriate. The Committee shall interview relevant employees involved in the whistleblowing process and the complainant her or himself.  The Committee shall be responsible for ensuring that the investigation is conducted fairly and that all decisions relating to it are reasonable and justified in the light of the evidence. The Whistleblowing Committee shall also ensure that procedural fairness is maintained in the investigation of the complaint as well as ensuring that the findings of the investigation are appropriate in light of the evidence.
(d)	The Whistleblowing Committee shall be responsible for preparing a written report to the Chairperson of the Audit Committee, showing how the investigation was carried out, a summary of the evidence received and recommended action, including any remedies to be offered. 
(e)	The Whistleblowing Committee may undertake any consultation that it may deem useful for the purpose of examining the issues referred to it, and may request the assistance, on an ad hoc basis, of any resource person or consultant whose expertise may, in the Committee’s judgment, be required to carry out its mandate.
(f)	The Whistleblowing Committee shall appoint an Investigations Manager, either from among members or outside depending on the nature of the complaint, who will lead the investigations into the reported allegations. He or she shall also arrange individual interviews with relevant witnesses or individuals and inform them of their right to be accompanied at the meeting by a legal advisor/trade union representative/work colleague. The other duties of the Investigations Manager shall be as follows:
i.	Establish the facts/obtain statements/collect documentary evidence.
ii.	Maintain detailed records of the investigation process. iii. Make any recommendations for action to be submitted to the Registrar. iv. Any other duties as assigned by the Committee.
The Investigations Manager shall have the following responsibilities towards the employee or party who raised the disclosure(s):
(a)	Hold a formal meeting with the employee making the complaint to discuss the matter.
(b)	Inform them of their right to be accompanied at any interview by a legal advisor/trade union representative/work colleague.
(c)	Keep the employee up to date with progress on the matter and agree timescales for action.
(d)	Notify the employee making the disclosure about the outcome of the investigation, including how the matter will be dealt with and whether they will be required to attend an investigatory interview.
(e)	Give details of employee support mechanism available.
The Investigations Manager shall have the following responsibilities towards the party against whom the disclosure is raised, pending consideration of the severity of the allegations, legal counsels’ advice and safeguards to avoid tipping off:
(a)	Inform the individual or individuals about whom the disclosure is made in writing of the seriousness of the allegations and provide any supporting evidence.
(b)	Advise in writing of the procedure to be followed.
(c)	Give the person the opportunity to respond in person and in writing to the claims made and receive and consider any relevant evidence.
(d)	Inform them of their right to be accompanied at any interview by a legal advisor/trade union representative  or work colleague.
(e)	Give details of employee support mechanism available.
(f)	The investigating officer may also be required to act as a witness at any subsequent disciplinary hearing if required.
(g)	Where necessary, the University shall provide support, counselling or mediation to any team subject to investigation in order to ensure normal working relationships are resumed as effectively as possible.
The officer appointed to hear an appeal shall have the following responsibilities:
(a)	Hold appeal meeting with employee who made the disclosure.
(b)	Ensure all parties are informed of their right to be accompanied at any meeting by a legal advisor/trade union representative/work colleague.
(c)	Review the investigation report/procedure followed and findings.
(d)	Decide whether to uphold appeal or not.
(e)	Initiate a new investigation if necessary.
(f)	Report the appeal findings in writing to the Committee.
(g)	Communicate outcome in writing to the employee making the disclosure and the employee against whom the disclosure is made .
